But in fact Christ has been raised from the dead, the firstfruits of those who have fallen asleep. For as by a man came death, by a man has come also the resurrection of the dead. For as in Adam all die, so also in Christ shall all be made alive. But each in his own order: Christ the firstfruits, then at his coming those who belong to Christ. 1 Corinthians 15:20-23
“But what about that whirling thing,” I point out.
Both teams will have one eye on the Bolton vs Tottenham game, as a win for Spurs would see them firm favourites for fourth spot. Should they slip up however, the winner of Chelsea-Newcastle will be in the driving seat. A draw at Stamford Bridge would see us no closer to knowing. As all four teams involved tonight need a win, there will be no shortage of goals I am sure.
See the devil may do as the devil may care
Here we lay encamp’d, it was this time in summer also.
I have no doubt I'll bake again when the urge returns, and if I make something worth sharing, I might even write about it here. But the mad dash will have to go on without me. I'll be just fine, God willing, now that I am learning balance.
Bubbly actress Preity Zinta, who is known to wear her heart on her sleeves, got candid with media recently when she spoke about her relationship status and her love life. She revealed that she is dating someone and it’s a big secret!
Mustard Greens
Here it is 3:00am and I am awake. What is going on? I woke up yesterday but after a while somehow managed to go back to sleep. Today its not going to happen. I have been awake since 1:00ish and my brain wont turn off. My eyes and my body are still so sleepy and want to be in bed but my brain is wide awake. So this morning ill do laundry and make Ryan breakfast and blog.
The most amazing part of this awakening has been the shift in my perspective, the literal change in my senses. I see people now. I see right through their physical, fleshy vessels and into the most delicate parts of their soul crying out to be seen. I hear people now. I listen to the words that flow from their mouths and hear directly into the heart of the child and the meaning behind the words they're really saying. I am experiencing heightened states of awareness when it comes to the pain each carries, and it has me vibrating beyond anything I've ever felt.
For we are given but one chance
Faith allows us to see a future even when our own dreams have died.
Where we used to live - near Maqueda (closer to Malaga city) we had a fire just down the track from us that lasted all afternoon and night. The bomberos left at about 9am and were back before lunch because it re-ignited. It was disgusting because it was paints and paint related chemicals. It came very close to our house in that instance. But again the whole thing was dealt with very efficiently.
Brandon Holstein: Really? Some cheesecake huh (laughing)? Do you like putting cherries on your cheesecake too?
A free walking tour of Sunset Park will be given on Saturday, June 27 from 2-4 p.m. Join curator Andy Urban and tour guide Dave Madden for an informative walk through Brooklyn’s Chinatown in conjunction with the Brooklyn Historical Society exhibit, "Living and Learning: Chinese Immigration, Restriction & Community in Brooklyn, 1850 to Present."
Pantaloons — tighter fitting and extended to mid calf or below. These were bias cut to achieve a much closer fit and typically worn with highly polished tall boots
Others (such as Ellis Cose) think that those who don’t have a certain definition of “fair share” are irrational (but Cose is oblivious to the fact that “the rich should pay their fair share” is an irrational argument since “fair share” is subjective):
Shela and Kumar Patel
What did I expect? Not this; not something that made everything I thought should be in a zombie movie OR a kung-fu movie go bye-bye out the window after my brain and my dignity.
I thought about taking in the chunky molding on top, to make it less top heavy – but then I was going to have to redo that and the crown. Nah thanks.
That's my reflection for today..
And, if you find yourself buying everything in site because you’re so hungry, you can stop by the intense cafe area for everything from pizza and paninis, to indian and chinese, to burgers, dogs and fries. Of course we had to get a little sometin’ sometin’ to tide us over, so we indulged in the balsamic chicken sandwich with roasted red peppers, olive oil, mozzarella, and broccoli rabe on their amazingly oooey gooey fresh baked bread. DE-LISH!
You get pretty standard performances from the three leads. None of them are award-winning actors as we all know, but fit very well into the genre. Williamson is probably my favorite with his ever-present cigar and natural charisma. Jim Brown is a good serious-minded type character. I think he may have done some of his own stunts, or at the very least the doubles were very well edited. And Jim Kelly... well... he has a six pack and kicks the shit out of people!
After the sharing options, you can also “like” a post by clicking on the “like” button.
We had one couple meeting us in Annapolis for the night. We had other friends that had spent the night in Annapolis the night before. We met up with them for lunch and convinced them to stay with us too. Apparently, the boat can fit 6 people for the night (our previous record was 5 people). We have ceramic space heaters so it was warm even outside of the cabin for the two people that had to sleep "upstairs."
Which maps the contours
The last three posts have been about the garden my daughter and I planted.
Mr. Poe had a certain charm and was especially favored by the ladies.
Something very exciting is on the horizon for those of you who love drapery hardware and are looking for something new and fresh to offer your clients. I’ve been working with Helser Brothers for two years to develop a new collection of drapery hardware and it’s finally almost ready to launch.
Well, I would never climb in.
grains and vegetables (a daily salad bar daily and offer baked
Tea parties filled with giggling girls,
I haven't posted since the horse trials because we haven't done anything. Klein is now on vacation time until I return from school in 2 months. This is some very well earned vacation time on her part! I know I have explained this before but...I'm going to say it again. Obviously in Hawaii there is no winter, you can ride year round as much as you want. It is the same where we are now in southern New Mexico. Yes, it can be cold but we have 350 days of sun here and this city doesn't even own a snow plow. Needless to say, we can train as much as we want to here as well. There really is no winter off time. Klein has been in regular work since July of 2010. Every couple months I give her two weeks of mini vacation to just rest. After every event she ALWAYS gets the following week off.
Are there any back-stories on characters?
Wednesday: Leftovers
“Nobody pushed you into that bar. You walked in there, and you ordered that drink, and naturally, you drank it. So don’t tell me you don’t know how you got there.” DR. BOB and the Good Oldtimers, page 274.
~ Canon in D by Pachelbel
Nature’s Path brand corn puffs have no ingredients in them except organic corn, and Jacob has happily eaten them dry since he was tiny. Even for a new eater with no teeth, they seem to kind of disintegrate in the mouth.
Haters, you also pointed out that I wrote about cake and pie and that other people in the world have written about cake and pie too. This is true. I am sorry that I talked about something that other people have talked about before. Please allow me to apologize by providing a preview of what it would look like if I only posted unique combinations of words that had never been talked about before:
Lawrence would be elected for three stressful one-year terms (spring 1834-spring 1837). At the very top of his to-do list was New York's water supply. The new mayor had inherited a city quickly bursting with new residents and a paltry water supply so rancid and inadequete that one source blames it for the increase in public drunkenness. (Hey people have to drink something, right?)
Thank you for your partnership with the ministry at UC Irvine. If you are interested in hearing more about our ministries or joining our financial support team, contact us! You can find our information on the “About Jen & Esther” page.
Both of these cards were created with MME goodies and burlap twine. A couple of my other faves. :)
The first part means, “to accept that something is or exists”, and the second
Woof woof! Bang Off, chaps!
12 Wading in the Velvet Sea
Acrylic and paper mediums
I hope I’ve eased the minds of Arizonans who feared they may have to solve all these questions on their own.
According to a high-level source in Beijing, key leaders in the Chinese Communist Party’s (CCP) Politburo have reached four points of consensus that will be announced on or around the 18th Party Congress. The tenor of the decision is that China will take the path of democracy. The news has been circulated hurriedly in Beijing.
Because of the way things are
“Basically what they are doing is moving around the villages and conducting political seminars and singing songs.”
From the floor plan when booking, we had expected that the seating would be rows of seats... but nothing of the sort.
theHouseAcrosstheBay is a great source of high quality digital sheets for all sorts of paper crafters. Card and tag creators, ATC/ACEO artists, scrapbookers, as well as jewelry makers can find a wide variety of vintage images, original art, and tons of grunge to help spur creativity and take your art projects to the next level. Whether you're new to the digital world or an wisened pro, THATB's digitals offer unlimited creativity. And helpful customer service will be happy to answer any questions you may have.
The other day she spouted off
BOGO: “Buy One Get One.” Will be followed by something like “50% Off,” “25% Off,” or “Free.”
However, a critical mind may speculate, that the princess is on a public relations trip.
“Joey? Where did you learn that word????”
Karel Griessel, 49, had opened the door to throw a bone to one of his dogs when three men overpowered him and one shot him in the leg.
So, this holiday season, instead of judging, try a little more kindness instead! Pay it forward and see if that doesn’t bring about more peace for us all.
If you are looking a free and fun way to add to a garden, this is it! Pallets can be used to make planters for small spaces. You can grow food or plant flowers, even on a balcony. Many work sites and commercial enterprises have extra pallets lying around that they are happy to get rid of. Our local nursery leaves them outback for people to take. Be sure to ask just in case the pallets have been promised already but, because many places have to pay to get rid of the pallets, they are usually very happy when someone comes by asking to take one or two.
Mary Kay Ultimate Mascara
People are so quick to jump on bandwagons without knowing the facts. Sometimes the facts are hard to know when you are five states away from an event.
Organic Skim Milk, Milk Solids, Live Yoghurt Cultures
The second story in the collection to channel fairytale wonder over real horror, this is still very beautiful. Beguilingly combines the plight of Japanese immigrants, family betrayal, slavery and mysterious heirlooms. This was a rather charming and well mannered finish to a seriously impressive anthology.
Who is or was Osama?
He walked across the floor, eyeballing me in that way that pigeons do and scurrying under the desk when I got too close. Then, suddenly, he started to look up, bobbing his little head in all different directions. He squat down, spread his wings, and vocalized as he fluttered right back up to his cage.
The victim’s father said in an interview with an online Moroccan newspaper that it was the court officials who suggested the marriage option when they reported the rape.
Dancers try to set a Guinness World Record for the greatest number of people dancing, in Bogota, Colombia, as part of the celebrations of International Dance DayPicture: GUILLERMO LEGARIA/AFP/GettyImages
It’s now time to welcome the 2012 Republican presidential contenders.
by Simon Reynolds
He is the one true thing.
Small example: Eating. Do you know how often I sit down to a meal without doing something else while I eat? Maybe twice a week. The other day, Chloe fixed dinner and set the table and got us all to sit down and eat together. Day before yesterday, I ate my lunch salad without checking email or surfing the 'net while I ate.
Because, my Love, it’s Spring.
to epileptic lands where in a flash
you think you know who i am
Make human intercourse grow less and less;
While the eventual goal of a good grade and graduation is lofty and appealing, it really isn’t a great in-the-moment motivator. That doesn’t mean that you can’t be motivated – you are just going to have to find something that does work. Try to reward yourself after a certain amount of work with M&M’s, movies that you like, or just a break to walk outside. Of course, you have to stick with your plan. If you struggle for control, ask a roommate or friend for help policing it.
Designed for exclusive use with the PENTAX 645D, this unifocal, ultra-wide-angle lens features PENTAX-original optics optimized for high-quality digital photography to ensure exceptional high resolution images. The sturdy construction of the lens, which is dustproof and weather-resistant, makes it ideal for outdoors photography.
as a soldier, in the American continental army, for one year, unless sooner
To finish the shadow box, I added a vintage brass drawer pull, and glass cover. The pieces is ready to hang on the wall or sit on a stand.
I hear Obama is waging a war on Religion too.
Now, as far as I know, my husband does not have a criminally insane wife locked away in the attic of a familial estate. I don’t think he even has a familial estate. But he came to our relationship with a less than stellar personal background, as most men, and women, do. And before I started dating him, I described him in much the same way Jane describes Rochester: arrogant, scathingly sarcastic, and incapable of keeping a critical opinion to himself.
I am glad to report that this Inquisitorial practice is no longer part of church management though the language echoing that dreadful past remains with us in phrases like, “heads are going to roll” and “losing your head” about something or someone. The Inquisitors, who were the head lopping pruners of the medieval church considered themselves tasked with “cleansing” the church of error. They saw themselves as those who were doing the pruning work that Jesus refers to in today’s Gospel reading.
- 1/4 c. of sesame seeds
On day 26, I decided to take him down to the gift shop. I stood him in front of the wall of crosses and told him, "God told me you are supposed to draw one of these crosses someday. Do you see any you'd like to draw?" I had no idea if he actually understood what I was saying to him, but he lifted his hand and pointed to one. I went back the next day and he pointed to the same one again! I purchased it later that day and brought it home for when the time was right.
I’ve been away from home for exactly six months and six days.
Town Hall is a brew pub, so beverage options will abound—but you’re on your own there. If you’re bringing a spouse, let us know at check-in. We’ll collect $10 to cover him or her.
What helps is to think in (a) yearly savings, (b) the hourly pay for your effort and (c) what you could do with the savings each year:
And on that note … is there any term or misconception about a genre that drives you bonkers?
Advisor: To be honest Minister, after removing the right to a final appeal for clemency to the Queen there's not that much scope left beyond processing the paperwork more quickly.
Tonight Oldest has requested that we go out for dinner. He has changed his mind so many times this week that I am uncertain where we will end up. It will be fun nonetheless.
That this same woman claims that she was bullied as a teen, writes articles and blog posts about the experience, and is using a site to raise money to have anti-bullying pamphlets printed, so that she can go into the schools to talk to children about bullying is the ultimate irony. This woman has wished me dead, and openly expressed her desire to be able to hasten my death. I think that somehow goes far and beyond bullying. What is she modeling to her own children with her bad behavior?
Mountain Sun Pub & Brewery Galloping Goose Steam
My hope is you/they will let me take a quick photograph of our Sunday sundae conversation.
Mercury is known to cause brain neuron degeneration and to disturb the central nervous system. Direct exposure to the metal causes immediate and violent effects:
I know it’s just a cartoon film, but being an adult makes you view cartoons differently! Haha!
A propos of not very much before closing, the Slog’s Treasury mole had me in stitches the week after Northern Rock added a ‘y’ to its name. A trio of Sir Humphreys walked into Alistair Darling’s office, and the exchange went roughly like this:
As a writing counselor at the Writing Success Program at UCLA, one of the most common problems I see, no matter what skill level of writing the student has, is word usage. Word usage problems usually stem from one of three reasons: the student does not understand the full meaning of the word, the student does not understand connotations attached to the word or the student does not use a word that fits in the context of the sentence.
So far the taking it one day at a time thing is working out okay. And being able to take Danny to daycare 5 days out of the week is a godsend. We've settled into a sort of a routine. Mornings Max nurses, Danny and I watch TV and I shuffle him off to daycare. I chat with the daycare director for a few minutes (pretty much my sole human contact for the day), then head home to nurse again and nap off and on again until lunchtime. At which point I try to do a chore or two, or get a quick workout in (nothing crazy, just riding the bike or walking or lifting some light weights). Then shower, pick Danny up and try not to lose my mind between 6 and 9 pm. That time period is when both kids are traditionally crying. Danny goes to bed around 7:30 or 8, and then only Max is crying until he goes to sleep around 9. Then I pop my Ambien and pray for more than 2 hours of sleep in a row.
JAMIE: Yes, I was in numerous plays starting from when I was a pre-teen. I didn’t start working in film, television and commercials until I came out here to LA though.
He is sitting up all the time, rolling over everywhere, and also moving himself all over. Trying to crawl, but not doing it. Just flailing about like he can't swim. And boyfriend's hair is OOC. It's duck like at the top, long on the sides. Might have to cut it soon. :( I think some teeth are trying to come through because he is a drool factory and still jamming everything in his mouth non stop!
3. Carolina Panthers
So through the last few winters, it has been very interesting or eye opening I should say. PEOPLE ARE HURTING!
Were there any American cardinals
The Treasure Hunter is out of California and his name is Bill Warren. He announced back in July of 2011 that he was going to raise an expedition to find the body the US Military dumped overboard in a burial at sea. His reasoning? He believes that our Government has lied about terminating the life of Osama bin Laden and he is out to recover the body and do DNA tests to prove out his theory.
"It's a racial discrimination that they feel is both systemic and also specific instances of ongoing discrimination that is felt at the individual level," he said.
We had fun, beautiful, elegant, gorgeous and stunning submissions for the Uplifting Sketch Challenge at Perfect Sentiment.
We do ask that you follow these few simple rules:
Gods and animals, homeless and mentally ill,
Happy spinning,
Vidal Sassoon, CBE born 17 January 1928 has died 9 May 2012 aged 84 he was an English hairdresser, credited with creating a simple geometric, “Bauhaus-inspired” hair style, also called the wedge bob.
Cooper talks confidently and freely about politics and current affairs: ‘I feel pretty confident we’ll get a Democratic administration next time round,’ he says, ‘but what Bush has done to our world needs a lot of patching up.’ And: ‘We’ve spent so much money on this war our bridges are falling down. As far as the infrastructure goes here, healthcare should be dealt with in this next election.’ And: ‘I’m glad to see Mr Brown is not so comfortable with President Bush. I think he takes a stronger stand on things.’
cake smash event is.
My daughter was sick, i'm feeling not that well and it's really busy at work the last weeks, so time flies,
'Frankly, my dear, I don't give a damn!'
Always see-through,
Just when the fruits were still green on the outside was the best times to eat those. Fresh from the trees. We did not even bother cutting the fruits up. Usually I liked it best with just a bit of salt. We bit into one, dipped into a bit of salt and finished each one that way. However, it was bad time to pick these fruits up, if of course you wanted them to ripen, which my grandmother did earnestly. There was an eternal battle between us kids and my grandparents. We tried our best to get to the fruits and my grandparents tried their best to protect them. There were no winners or losers in the end. We did munch away to glory to Guavas, that we often ended up 'stealing' with a bit of salt, a lot of laughter and amidst tales of who was the bravest and who ended up stealinst the best fruit.
Is it fun, no?
Overall, it’s a bland and idiotic movie in an unconventional setting for a redneck killers flick. Definitely not recommended.
Chris & Connie’s Langos Recipe:
Director : David M. Evans
This is what made me,
where do i go from here?… im not talking about where do i go iva a building.. but where do i go via my relationship with God…. he has always had me as an unusal daughter of the Kingdom! .
This week I would like to share some of the great early literacy ideas I have found recently. Ideas for letter recognition, spelling, sight words and even poetry.
But that's awfully uncreative. And I don't really want that.
As usual to his style, the author has also talked about some of the good work that was done by some white people during all these years and that only highlights that in any race there are always bad and good people and these good people act as rainbow in the dark and keep the hope alive.
Well, lately, the old feelings of inadequacy came creeping back. I think it came with my decision to seek out donor milk again. If these women could pump for my baby, then I should, too. Lola's bigger now, and she's content to sit on the floor and play while I hook up and pump. I feel good about pumping now, even if I usually only get half an ounce every 2 hours.
“I think we need to deepen our knowledge of politics.
He made the remarks after police arrested his brother, dentist Omer Butt, in a row over parking.
my next visit the dentist is in mid-may, so i will get to have my usual bakes on most saturday morning when dear is working... had wanted to bake some oatmeal cookies, but dear requested for pizza... so pizza it is! and i did not even get to taste the pizza! dear finished it up on his own!!!
I KNOW I have some flower pictures somewhere, but for now this will have to suffice. It's from a trip to England in April 2004, at least that is what the photo file says.
We are all a part of one giant farm of ideas and interests. The more we bloom the more we share our produce with our fellow beings. So, people, get blooming! Wherever you are!
Many Church Fathers thought they found here a testimony about the two natures of Christ, human and divine. But, against this, v. 3 does not focus on Jesus’ human nature per se, but rather on his human lineage through David, and v. 4 is not about what Christ is according to his divine nature but rather about what happened to Jesus at the resurrection, when God’s Spirit raised him from the dead and designated or marked him out as Son of God in power. In other words, these are comments about two phases in the trajectory of Jesus’ career…The unusual phrase “Spirit of Holiness” is surely not a reference to Jesus’ human spirit. Rather it refers to the effect of the Holy Spirit on Jesus – Jesus enters an entirely sanctified or glorified condition when he is raised from the dead by the Spirit.[22]
Ortiz DH
If you find yourself in this mode of thinking, I’ve got a news flash for you: reality doesn’t give a damn what you think; it doesn’t give a damn what the president thinks. And casting blame hither and yon will do nothing to change that. Sorry to burst your bubble.
Hello my friends! I have really missed being here so often, I really hope to get back into the swing of things soon. :)
He always calls when he is on his way home to see if we need anything.
If you ever searched the Internet in a desperate attempt to “figure this junk out” only to find yourself bumping up against the same 3 or 4 of the same looking ads and pages from just a small handful of leaders, you will understand exactly what I mean by ad blindness.
Stay tuned to ‘The Temasek Times’, the ‘Number One’ socio-political news blog in Singapore which brings you the FASTEST news 24 hours a day round the clock, faster than any other site!
SIDE B
- Could take you for a drink and find out?
And who do you think you are?
"If you've ever dreamed of joining the ranks of the very first Cricut Challenge Blog on the net, now's your chance. BBTB2 is adding a few new members to the team and one of them could be YOU!
As one agent said, "You're too close to the scene of the crime and you have no perspective." She meant that trying to make your experience into fiction tends to take away the spontaneity and imaginative flow.
I've talked about marketing so many times on this blog, but it's hugely important. Especially if you go with a small press, like I have. Who's going to find my book? Where are they going to buy it? These are things that it comes down to me, the author, to lay the foundation for before my book comes out. If anyone hears about my book, it's going to be because of my own (initial) contact with that person. I expect the first 2-300 copies I sell will be direct sells, where I have personally spoken with someone, told them about my book, and either hand sold it to them or directed them to my website to buy it.
Angel Rivera (Reclusiveracer): This image seems to have been given more attention than others. Was there a personal accomplishment you looked for when working on it?
Much of this could be avoided if we introduced our children to the Gifts of the Holy Spirit at an early age, especially the gift of “praying in the spirit”. For you see this gift continues the infilling process of the Holy Spirit in us, The more we pray in the spirit the more of the spirit we imbibe, bringing us to a greater spiritual maturity. This spiritual maturity begins to provide the infilling our spirit is seeking turning us closer and closer to the Divine. It also permits us to enter into worship in a way that we could never experience at the soul level alone. For instance, John the Revelator was in alone in a cave on the island of Patmos on the Lord’s day worshipping “in the spirit” when he was caught up into Heaven and into the Sanctuary of God (Rev. 1:10)
Mr. Corn laments that he paid 8% for his pension and for that unholy contribution he feels he has earned his $12,707.59 monthly pension or $152,490.84 per year. Mr. Corn paid his 8% for all of 31 years too. Wow that’s impressive. The rest of us have to work 40 or 45 year careers in order to get our pension (Social Security) at age 62 or 67 respectively. But then again teachers are special.
When did you first decide that you wanted to write?
For this reason, the story-within a story motif was a common tactic in Gothic fiction, conjuring the idea of a normal friend relating a scary story they heard, making the frightening aspects of the story seem like they could almost be real.
These people, because they do not have truth, liberty, or even attractiveness (let alone Beauty) on their side, they are easy to defeat - but only if you try. But if you do, ahhh the joys of Conservativism, "To crush your enemies -- See them driven before you, and to hear the lamentation of their women (or metrosexuals, as the case may be)!" Sorry, couldn't resist.
13. Shake Some Action
(For Heaven's sake, stop worrying that shoe!)
Women – love the color pink.
I should add that by the time of my third visit, Marv had made remarkable inroads to his dinner. The belly and guts of the late and lamented eland had been devoured, leaving only the rib cage. Both hind legs had been torn off and were maturing nicely, the neck was being saved for a later snack and rested carefully on the buckled forelegs.
W2: Wow. Where do you find the time?
So far I'm loving this 'challenge'! Day two (actually I've taken pics everyday this year ;) Anyway, who would have thought it would be this fun and that one could think of a thousand, well hopefully 365 ways of being really creative with a phone? I'm actually excited and really looking forward to this...I may have to post more than one pic a day, I'm having a hard time choosing just one!
At the biggest and most recognizable Internet companies–Amazon, Facebook, Google, Twitter, Yahoo!, and startup du jour Instagram–there are a few powerful women in the C-suites, but very few are at the head of the boardroom table.
Before dinner, we had drinks at Havana Garage. Just kind of stumbled upon it. Wanted to have a couple drinks before dinner. And this seemed to be a nice place.
“Oh wow, I love the color, they make them in blue? Didn’t know that, nice.”
My Islam is waking up from dogmatic death
Parents: in addition to locking up your booze and pills, you now have to lock up your spice cabinet. This morning I read about a new “trend” called The Cinnamon Challenge. This consists of swallowing a spoonful of cinnamon without drinking water – and trying not to gag or vomit. Sounds awesome, right? Well it would be, except for inhaling cinnamon (or any dry powder really) can cause breathing problems and lung injuries.
4) Heat up 2 small bowl of water in wok. Add in 1 carrot(sliced), cabbage, 1 teaspoon of salt, 1/2 teaspoon of sesame oil, ½ teaspoon of dark soya sauce and 1 table spoon of light soya sauce. Mix 2 table spoon of corn flour with a little cold water and pour it in the soup to make it thick. Beat 1 egg and add it slowly into the boiling soup. Pour the soup on the rice vermicelli, garnish with the fried shallots and spring onion(optional). The dish is ready to be served.
Linda Buckley-Archer writes:
Oyster cakes here are sold in two variations, one with oyster and and one without. I naturally went for the former.
That doesn’t mean Congress won’t eventually act to extend the relief, Luscombe said.
Everything has been super busy, darons mother was here (I think she made hell freeze over and that why it’s so damnn cold here) - I almost didn’t make it she was here forever... in laws should come with carfax!
unwillingly learning to let go of the old and storied rose varieties, that battle with the heat, leaf loss and sunburn. Choosing the disease resistant modern varieties, WITH fragrance – like Perfume Passion which has a layer of buds at shoulder height now.
Threads in a hole spin half, one-half and anti-spin on with negative values
A Prayer for Divine Speech (vv. 12-13): David began this psalm in silence and then moved to speech. As he concludes this psalm, he asks God to break His silence as well. David’s explicit petition to God to “hear,” “listen,” and be “not deaf” is also an implied petition for divine speech. David asks God to be God, to distinguish Himself from the idols which have neither ears to hear nor lips with which to speak. David realizes if God remains silent then he will be an “alien,” a “stranger,” and will be “no more.” The good news for David, and for you, is that God does not remain silent like the idols (see Isa. 42:14-17). God addresses the issues of the nature and meaning of life as He addresses all other issues—in His Son. God broke His silence in Jesus Christ, “In the past God spoke to our forefathers through the prophets at many times and in various ways, but in these last days he has spoken to us by his Son” (Heb. 1:1-2).
Shadow Home Office Minister
Next follow me to Hebrews 13:5, which says, “Let your conversation be without covetousness; and be content with such things as ye have: for he hath said, I will never leave thee, nor forsake thee.”
While I feel Glamour is better it is also harder to get off so for that reason I use Expander as my everyday mascara.
5. To some it’s Bungy, others call it bungee. Bungee or bungy, I want to do that Jumping. I know this is an extreeme adventure.A major adrenalin rush. And ever since para gliding was attempted and succeeded (a decade back – graduation time), this has been in my wish-list.
Concord Crush Ink # 119785
Row 8: sc in each sc across, ch 1, turn (4).
I dreamed last night.
Mother Nature, the most just of all the mothers, is on my side. You should be too.
They may not be very good at creating ads, but they are brilliant at writing presentations that get MBAs to nod their heads.
the Divine resolution, the sublime and humble solution
although we spent more time relaxing than on a typical weekend, i did make time to shoot some portraits.
Happiest Moment:
This was a bankruptcy planning meeting for a very large company with tentacles in just about every area of the business world and the room must have had almost a thousand people in it, and this was just the financial controllers, managers, vice-presidents and so on.
2 garlic cloves crushed
Are you aware that the ESV continues to evolve? When will it grow up? I was sent the link below by a friend today and it troubles me. The document lists nearly 300 changes and this group is only one in a series of revisions that have appeared (quietly) since its publication over a decade ago.
Both men are fellow Directors of CGGVeritas Services (Malaysia) Sdn Bhd, based in the Petronas Tower in KL. This company is a subsidiary of the massive international oil exploration concern CGGVeritas, part of the French engineering giant Schlumberjer.
This card was for my daughter who likes to dream a lot:-) She is only 4 but you all know at this age, they love to dream and sometimes, I wish I could go ahead and dream away with her. She has a very big creative mind. I have stamped my criss cross stamp a lot of times to create my own pink paper. Unfortunately, I don't know the name.
**Names have been changed to protect the identity of this family. All quotes are mother’s exact words and it must be noted that her first language is not English.
The Plot: Juliet, ten, has lost her best friend, Lowell. Why? Because Juliet is a girl. Six years of friendship mean nothing, now that Lowell is friends with Tommy and Mike. Boys do boy stuff, she is told, and girls do girl stuff.
International human rights groups including Amnesty International have called on Bahrain to release al-Khawaja.
Mr. Ratner scored a coup of sorts when he received the support of the Association of Community Organizations for Reform Now, or Acorn, the advocacy group that has fought previous Forest City projects, which this time struck a deal to include a significant amount of moderate- and low-cost housing in the project.
Kolbe writes a day-by-day curriculum for all subjects all grades. (I think high school might be weekly plans instead of daily?) You can choose to use the program in a variety of ways:
Assigned to the Atlantic Fleet, Reuben James sailed from Newport, R.I., 30 November 1920 to Zelenika, Yugoslavia, arriving 18 December. During the spring and summer of 1921, she operated in the Adriatic and the Mediterranean out of Zelenika and Gruz, Yugoslavia, assisting refugees and participating in postwar investigations. In October 1921 at Le Havre, she joined Olympia (C-6) at ceremonies marking the return of the Unknown Soldier to the United States. At Danzig, Poland, from 29 October 1921 to 3 February 1922, she assisted the American Relief Administration in its efforts to relieve hunger and misery. After duty in the Mediterranean, she departed Gibraltar 17 July 1922.
Here is a little set of Thank You cards I made for my Mentor.I use a nestabilitie to create the shape of the card and added the Butterfly stamp from SU on the envie.
To heal, to minister,
These individuals have enjoyed the trappings of state power for almost half a century.
The big dog doesn’t stir.
Rest in Peace "Pawpaw" Larry.
Is it really the 18th week? I can’t believe it! My kids get out of school on May 25th! That’s 4 weeks! I’m starting to panick! I’m not ready for them to be home full time for the summer!! I really, seriously cannot believe yesterday was my birthday. It’s already that late in the year?!! I swear it just started! But I did enjoy celebrating my birthday! It was a wonderful day filled with pampering and love and presents. I got everything I wanted! The most exciting thing of all?
This recipe is for a moist champagne cake filled with raspberry curd and topped with a champagne french buttercream.
Especially younger people. Let's be honest, they are rather impressionable and we need to be careful to show the next generations what is and isn't appropriate.
Rating - 4 out of 5
Yesterday, Tasha and I spent about 2 and a half hours making a power ballad/ballad mix on a whim. Our list got so extensive, we now are making it a 2 disc set. I’m not sure what this says about our real ages or coolness factor but whatever. I absolutely can’t wait to burn the mix onto a cd when I see Tasha on Friday. I can’t wait even more to finally install the cd player I got LAST Christmas into Weezy so I can drive without having to have a cd player on my lap. Sigh. Sharp turns always turn into a disaster, what between the cd player flying and my coffee spilling since 90′s VWs didn’t have cup holders? Ugh.
What he should have bought was a noose, to hang his self.
What are your feelings on pitch correction and these electronic tuners that fix out-of-tune vocals? Some artists say they are crap and make everything sound bland. What do you recommend for singers to warm up their voices, stay in tune, and avoid the machinery to fix the vocals in post production?
I appreciate their efforts but I miss the old mugs of mustard... and the look on the face of a date when she returned from the old uni-sex toilet with the urinals big enough to get lost in.
At the 9/26/11 meeting, Adams, a Brooklynite, was genial but essentially gave no quarter, asserting that his agency, which has the dicey task of both evaluating and shepherding the project, was capable of monitoring the project without the more independent governance.
Police arrested 13 men in raids across Oxford on Thursday, March 22, after investigating the suspected ring since May last year.
Blog Post 2
In the morning, the producers thought it’d be fun to let Beyan fly a billion hours to meet Ben in Switzerlan so she could get closure on their breakup. Ben was kind of like “I have to play this cool because I am on TV but please go back to your Nazi parents”. Ben politely explained that “you got cut because the thought of spending time with your parents is worse than the thought of sticking a metal skewer up my ass and rotating myself rotisserie-style over one of the fires in the Slutensuite.”
Add salt and chilli powder over the mangoes and allow them to rest for 3 days with just a toss over every morning.
she comes from nowhere and dares
Yesterday was much hotter than we have had in the past week. 97 degrees and muggy. When it is muggy and hot in my state, every business owner turns their AC down to 32 degrees. This is not fun for me. Anytime I go into a building I become a Popsicle. I literally freeze, so for me the hotter it is outside the more layers I put on in order to counteract the inside temps. It is easy for me to remove a top shirt or vest while in the car and pop it back on when I head into a store or business.
Sources told the Los Angeles Times that Michael Cormier, 61, appears to have died of arsenic poisoning on April 20, the day the Los Angeles coroner’s office released their preliminary autopsy report on Mr Breitbart.
There will also be a wide array of keg beers on offer from highly-respected breweries like Sierra Nevada, and also little-known in the UK but nonetheless multi award-winning microbreweries like Yards from Philadelphia..
an homage to
5. If you’re feeding your infant baby formula, opt for a powdered formula rather than a liquid where BPA-lined cans and lids are likely to pose more of a risk.
While I was outside the siren call of the lawnmower sang out. I was sorely tested to let her rip and do a quarter of the yard or something. Reason, with her soothing song, led me to safety though. No, nothing wrong with mowing. But right now, to get from point "a" to point "b", and it is a bit time sensitive to my mind, I can't go off burning juice I barely have enough of in any case doing something major aside from what I am doing. I gave myself a gold star and promised I would get some good salami the next time I am in town, cheese too. Boo-yeah. Take that you stinking SIREN! :)
The consensus among those sharing the bottle was that there was a big hit of coriander in it, and though I can't say it's something I noticed myself I'd be doing you a disservice if I didn't mention it, so there you go. What I did get were some other slightly bitter herbal complexities, reminding me of a gruit ale I made a few years ago using oregano and sage. (Edit: Ha haaa! Follow-up investigations have revealed it is flavoured with sage. Coriander indeed. Tch!)
Shoring her fury, Emma strode up to the wall of wind then and with a feat of righteous rage cut -through- the magical barrier–sundering the spell and opening a window for Meryk to act! The barbarian was rewarded by the dragon’s attentions next, a brutal barrage of blows tearing Emma down from her feet–but now, Meryk had begun to loose arrows against the undead dragon as Thane Fenris charged into melee, though not before a pillar of fire had struck against them with a gesture from King Kroma!
Benji Durden, Coach
It's amazing what you find when researching. This morning I found this information on cats. The article talks about how cats can have thyroid problems and one possible cause is.....BPA!
7 costumes in four weeks was a challenge... but I got the job done.
The three monotheistic religions made it clear in their sacred texts that homosexuality is a sin, but that is a matter of belief. On a strictly physiological basis, nature ordains that there are two sexes, male and female, and they exist for the propagation of the species. That’s why marriage is regarded as essential to any society.
And those who ancient lines did ley will heed the song that calls them back.
I'm linking up with JB47's 100 Word Challenge. This weeks the prompt was the inclusion of four words; apple, empire, enormous, liberty and yellow.
This is a story that can appear slow at first, however it is one of the most suspenseful novels I've read recently. This is a complete story from beginning to end, which is quite something given the micro and macro scales Love examines. Once the chess game is officially started between Faith and the Charles Manson you'll be hooked as their back and forth fights are taut scenes that please.
This is what it looks like:The place is a standing bar/shop that sells Nagano products (mainly alcohol and some snacks from small jars). The place will accomodate about 15 or so people.
Me and you
In the beginning people were enthusiastic, had energy and visions. They came equipped, their boats travelling up the river filled with objects with which to observe, measure, analyse. They were going to sort out and comprehend this disorderly part of the world like their kind had with so many places before. They were sure of their abilities. They came to conquer.
#6) Kiddy fun for adults
While we were there (and we will gloss over the ditches DH made me clamber through and the fact he was very close to letting me fall flat on my face in the mud), there was a massive storm about six miles away. The thunder was incredible, because it’s not like hearing a storm in a city with a background of traffic. This was birdsong, birdsong, and literally five seconds of booming, rolling thunder. This scene over the oilseed rape fields will give you an idea of the sky.
and between intense glances
The new Baker Motor Company website features a sleek portal that presents all the automotive brands, an updated search function for new and pre-owned vehicles, an easier way to schedule service, see the latest specials, explore the three locations and so much more. We feel it truly captures the modern luxury treatment and commitment to customer service that Baker is all about, and we’re thrilled to finally roll it out to their customers. Check it out now!
But the country doesn't have any.
Oven gloves
Erudite is still trying to take over all factions, but they need Divergent to study them and see what it is that makes them tick so they can create a simulation they cannot wake up from. Jeannine is on a mission and she's ready to torture and kill anyone for that opportunity.
i wanted to just catch up our last few weeks of fun and friendship. i last left off with a birthday party on april 25th. so let's see where we've been and what we've done since then...
"I-I-Ill hold m-my Stomach and g-g-roan and throw it at h-him!"
And then there is the childless couple who wants children banned. Maybe I'm wrong, but I'm pretty sure they were both babies at some point in their lives. And when they were babies, I'd bet money on the fact that they cried on occasion. And if we asked their mothers, I'm sure we would find out that some of those fits of crying were in public. GASP!!! Children are going to cry. They are going to get upset. Sometimes even though a fit in a public place like a restaurant or airplane - but I don't think the solution is banning them from entering those spaces. The solution is better parenting and teaching our children how to behave in those spaces and places. If we can't take our children out, then how will they ever learn how to behave in public? You can role play with them, read them books on the topic and tell them until you are blue in the face, but until they are sitting strapped into a booster seat in a restaurant with white table clothes, they really won't get it. It's the experiences our children have that really mold them and their behavior. When Paige acts up in a restaurant, we tell her to stop. If she doesn't listen, we take her outside for a "time out". A few weeks ago Daniel brought her outside at least 5 times during one meal. And it was frustrating. But the next time went a lot smoother. And I'm sure each time we go, she will behave better and better. If we had been banned from entering a restaurant, Paige never would have had the experience of learning to control herself in that space.
To anything that’s different
Fantastic film ostensibly about a botched burglary staged by Irish revolutionaries and sold as an exciting film noir, which it is if that is all you want from it. However this film is not truly about burglary or the IRA, it is not even a political statement it is a morality play. What this film is truly about is how a variety of people treat a condemned and dying man in the last 8 hours or so of his life. It is about what goes on inside his head ... it is about compassion ... it is about the lack of compassion - It is about redemption - and the denial of redemption.
Robinson said the coyote “came in high,” a hunting maneuver designed to ensure his feathered prey couldn’t fly off.
In the meantime, more photos. With the Sinaki move, you can position your arms in any number of ways to increase the difficulty.
Music can be as much an outlet for self-expression as it can be a tool to communicate with others. There is a pervasive theme with black metal bands, no matter the country, that accomplishes neither of the aforementioned goals. Most are too obsessed with the public persona of Satanism and the need to seem as evil as possible. It is rare to find bands that use the genre as a means of true personal expression. Luckily, I stumbled upon a band from the United Arab Emirates that does just that. Thamud, ironically a one-man band named after an ancient race of people in Arabia, is a project created purely as a means of self-expression. It was the manifestation of a man's desire to reach out to anyone that would listen.
before the movie is over, we are treated to Superfly, My First, My Last, My Everything by Barry White, and the Carpenters’ Top of the World. These songs work splendidly in context of the film’s fish-out-of-water humor, and so for a while Dark Shadows is actually pretty damn entertaining. The first half-hour or forty-five minutes rollicks along with good humor, grace, and Burton’s trademark visual ingenuity.
This time, she tried it once, got about a third of the way up, and came immediately back down. (They're on rappelling ropes, or belays, or whatever that is called.) I said, no problem, and we contentedly watched of the other girls go up to the top - there was a siren at the top that they could ring. I asked her a couple of times if she wanted to try again, as the other girls had taken several turns, but she declined...until, right at the very end, she agreed to try it one more time.
(the link is to an article in Hebrew on Ynet). The service is based on one written for the Chief Rabbinate of Israel for Yom Ha-Atzmaut, but it had definitely had some non-traditional aspects. We began by singing sad songs, which was followed by a brief video interview of the widow of a soldier who had died in the second Lebanon War in 2006 - he threw himself on a grenade to save the lives of his men. The songs then became happier as we approached Yom ha-Atzmaut. This part of the service ended with the recital of several psalms. For the first one, each congregant, first the men and then the women, recited the verses in turn. (Since this is an Orthodox shul, I hadn't expected the women to be asked!). Then the rabbi blew the shofar, and began the evening service (Ma'ariv). Prayers were sung with tunes from celebratory Israeli songs. It was a very moving service. I hadn't known what to expect at all, since I've never been to one of these services.
I love the Halal shops and the many Halal eateries. I love the fact Burger King will deliver food right to my home for 2 riyals. I love the fact that KFC delivers Halal chicken. We had stopped eating American fast food except the fillet o fish and tuna before coming to Saudi Arabia. I love it that I have so many choices for eating Halal in Saudi Arabia. I love it that my husband has created a new routine for us where every Thursday morning, he will bring home parathas (fried flat bread), aloo bhara parathas (fried flat bread filled with potatoes) and spicy chana (chick peas) all for a total of 30 riyals or about 8 dollars. We wouldn’t get that much food for 8 dollars in the States.
Follow the instructions:
La Milonga del Treno is a fashionable Milonga located in Milan, Italy.
Coming This Wednesday...Artful INKables is having a New Release Blog Hop...Peeps...You really do not want to miss out on this...Kristin's images are amazing!!! She is so darn talented that she can go from cutesie animals to Beautiful Elegant images...You all have got to see these new releases...Ya know, I do not have to go on and on about Artful INKables, just because I am on the DT...(Go Me)...mainly because once you see these stamps, you are really gonna love them all.
Arsenal’s hot snood wearing shot Samir Nasri has agreed a bumper new deal with Arsenal that will ward of any potential suitors who may have been hoping to lure the midfielder away from the Emirates this summer.
The apostle was so sure of Onesimus’ true conversion that he sent him back to his master, Philemon, with these words. I am reading Philemon 18. “If he hath wronged thee, or oweth thee ought, put that on my account.” Then in verse 19 he added, “I will repay it.”
8 Screenings:
We are left with indefinite adolescence and a Peter Pan Syndrome epidemic where some men want to remain boys forever.
"Did you kill it?"
“Carfax for Homes”
I get pretty jealous of all these lovely lightweight and / or sleeveless entries by people who live in less cruel climates. Right after these pictures were taken my arms got frostbite, gangrenous and then fell off. Continuity-buffs, you will also note that my hair got be-ponytailed during the picture taking. This was due to extreme wind whipping my hair across my face and interfering with that soul-searching look I am sending you through your computers.
A newer medication that is considered investigational is a melatonin agonist presently known as LY 156735. An agonist is a drug that stimulates activity at cell receptors that are normally stimulated by such naturally occurring substances as melatonin. LY 156735 was found to speed up the readaptation time of volunteer subjects following a simulated 9-hour time shift.
According to the official time sheet we were a second apart, but I think it only rounded to the nearest second because it was super close, she just had the edge by a step though. It was a great push to the end and the result was fantastic.
God placed man in the Garden
Some of the clues were straightforward. Some of them were riddles that we had to decipher. We probably spent at least an hour wandering around our little apartment, seeking the little bit of candy and all of those hard-boiled eggs that we colored. I never ate the eggs. I hated the Peeps. I enjoyed the jellybeans, which came from our school's annual fundraiser. My favorites were (and still are) the Cadbury Eggs. Those were few and far between, though. I had to knock my sister out of the way should I spot one. We didn't get much, but we were grateful for what we had. In fact, I didn't realize until I was an adult how little those Easter baskets actually were. I still have mine and use it in my classroom at this time of year.
Comparisons with Devo will be made, and while they perhaps share a soul and a mutual sense of determined oddity, The Chap’s output is more erratic and frenzied than Devo’s streamlined weirdness. Shredded bows hack at cellos, staccato riffs jerk back and forth and singer Johannes von Weizsäcker (what a name!) lurches goggle-eyed about the stage, losing a fight with his guitar, and announcing before every song, ‘You’re gonna love it!’. The drummer demonstrates a delighted fascination with a plastic bottle, analysing it from all sides like Kubrick’s gorillas in A Space Odyssey, before returning efficiently to the task at hand.
its
Week 16 - Mar 10th - Julie- tape mani of your choice
Just as Linkin Park announces the news of their new album ‘LIVING THINGS’ that’s due for release this June 2012, another band has been causing a stir on the Rock/Rap scene. Xtatic Line, from the west coast of Florida gave the details of their new EP ‘RE:Dawn’ and their views on being dubbed ‘the new Linkin Park’ to our Collaborator Matthew Trevett.
But there was a problem, keeping myself entertained while I drove the distance for about three hours a day. Radio killed me, because out of the two hours I listened more than one hour to commercials. And the music on my iPod, even though it was quite a lot, became very repetitive at one moment. Until a colleague of mine advised me to buy a Sirius Satellite Radio. I did some research and soon found out that there were two satellite radio providers back then; Sirius and XM. In all the reviews XM seemed to get the better ratings, but she convinced me to try out Sirius. Also, she mentioned, because you could then also get Howard Stern on it, because he just had signed up with the radio station.
I appreciate French Architecture even more having seen it.
It was raining. Around us were hundreds of students, each one with an umbrella. Joanne stopped one after another asking for directions, and they smiled and shrugged, or smiled and pointed, and slowly we homed in to the the Institute of Sericulture and Systems Biology, Southwest University, Chongqing. It is a large building, looking much like any typical modern university department in the UK, but this one tucked in among high sub-tropical trees and sweeping driveways.
on friday we went to a graduation party for one of our best friend steven, who graduated from Texas Wesleyan Law School on friday. although the majority of the people that were there were his family, we had a great time and are so proud of him! on saturday, we worked around the house during the morning and then went to joe t's for mandee, my step-sister's, graduation dinner. she graduated from UNT saturday afternoon and we could not be more proud of her either! and i must note that joe t's has THE BEST margaritas in fort worth hands down. after dinner we headed home and had a quiet evening at home!
The worst part? There was a veritable boatload of strange and unusual things to photograph:
500grms Fresh Paneer
Yitzchak represents din. He is defined by the akeidah – strict judgment and complete adherence to Hashem’s will. He was willing to forfeit his life in a seemingly senseless sacrifice to fulfill Hashem’s command. That is why when Avraham accepted the mitzvah of milah – an element of din, Hashem informed him about the birth of Yitzchak who is also din.
The latest flavour (last week) is cinnamon bun soft serve - it tastes like cinnamon and butter and sugar. It's the stuff kids dreams are made of, but veers toward incredibly sweet by the time you're halfway through.
celebration and tolerance of all communities in London - all of which have made London the exceptional city that it is. Every Londoner should be able to openly express their cultural identity without fear of intolerance or hate.
Bert’s eyes widened with the wondrous appearance of a little boy. “Why, whatever are you talking about?”
The length and breadth
If the featured image is smaller than the header art, it is displayed on the right side of the post with the post title and excerpt on the left side. This is exciting as it gives you options to create wide or smaller images in the slider. However, there is one small issue you might want to consider, and consider changing.
Trained early on by the talented Tony Kozina, Richards combines wrestling with Muay Thai and Brazilian Jiu-Jitsu to provide fans with an offense that often leaves them breathless.
knoxville is where i met my husband.
Millie Jackson – “Hurts So Good” (Spring)
3) What is your favorite book? Kathryn, cover your eyes (no, that's not a book title). It's not that I don't enjoy reading, I just haven't made time for reading in such a long time. I can't even come up with a favorite :(
Method: Beat the eggs well; add the salt, turmeric powder, greens, and milk; and mix well. Heat a frying pan and pour in the ghee. When hot, addd the onion, green chillies, and ginger. Saute all till onions turn limp. Remove from heat and mix it well with the beaten eggs. Heat the frying pan again and grease it with a little ghee. When hot, pour in the egg batter to a round like a dosai or pancake. Cook over low heat till the eggs set. Using a sharp-edged spoon, turn over the egg, and cut it into quarters. A wonderful accompaniment with plain rice, roti, or any of the bread sandwiches. Serve hot and enjoy!
There are options and people need to look into them instead of settle for the status quo because today's youth are being damaged because of it.
Duration: 50 mins approx
Watch it now, spread the word and use it whenever and wherever you would like…
RingMaster 04/03/2012
may go swift and far.
(The Politics)
Whether you're looking to alleviate anxiety or plant the suggestion early, DOCTOR features 25 full-color photos of of doctors, nurses and medical equipment along with a title under each image.
They were just walking out of the cafe as it happened, Chris (Mrs) pushed her husband hard out of the way of falling debri, he still didn't have the strength to move at any pace. He was knocked to the ground by part of a falling building and she threw herself over top of him to protect him from anything else coming down. When the dust cleared she noticed that he was bleeding out from his leg, she ripped off her top and tried to tourniquet his thigh, it wouldn't work, he fell unconcious. A couple of people tried CPR but he didn't recover and a policeman told them they had to leave. Chris (Mrs) punched the policeman in despair, how could he think she could leave her still warm husband there?? She had no choice, a shop assistant covered his body with a curtain, Chris (Mrs) took his wallet from his pants, she couldn't bear to think of people going through it, and she wrote his name and details on the curtain ---- and left her soulmate.
The first thing that grabs the viewer's attention is the fact that we have a consistent musical score throughout...not that this is a good thing, because it is the same blooping, monotonous bleat of Casio keys we got in the middle of BDDFH, without the benefit of a rock guitar tune at the beginning and end. No, all broken electric keyboard beats start to finish. And some screeching high-pitched...well, I guess they call it singing. But for the life of me, I can only imagine someone's torturing a cat with a bug zapper.
Before introducing the new piece, let just add that one of the Co-Owners of UNDA (Liliana Neves) is going to be in Vilnius – Lithuania from 29th of April to 13th of May, and if anyone needs to talk to her personally, just contact UNDA team.
Min 12: “Wait, I just gained another follower! Oh, it’s that dude’s blog where I commented 57 times. After he did a background check on me and realized that I was not imminent threat to him or his family, he finally decided to follow. Phew.”
I really wasn't sure how well I would be able to pull it off but functionally it was fine. None of my partners had difficulty reading the lead, which was a relief. Anyway, my impressions to date are as follows:
The idea when I began was to trundle around the back roads in the sun looking for interesting things. The mist did hamper this somewhat, as did interesting things that were too far away or too near the windows of the expensive houses that I passed. I know these houses are expensive as there were Mercedes and the like parked there in abundance. Now I am not one to look through folks windows but I did notice few people were up and around. Few closed their curtains either! While I enjoyed the trip I did make the slight mistake of going down a new road and enjoying the slope downwards. Great relief from the pedalling but the road sign at the far end pointed me towards Dunmow and unwilling to go back up the slope I foolishly went on, this was far too far from home for my knees. There was nothing for it but to continue until and hope for a way back to appear. Luckily I stumbled on a road back and ended up in Felsted instead.
Flowers - Wild Orchid Crafts
“We also made the decision that every single person involved should agree to our using their tweets. It helped that I came from that Egyptian activist background. I knew who to contact and people didn’t see us so much as a bunch of outsiders coming in to make money off their backs.
- 5,000 to 10,000 Filipino died
Now, the yard sale (which I will write about later) took care of the crap in the living room, the kitchen is clean and free of (almost) all fruit flies, the fridge is in and working great. I was finally able to make dinner in my kitchen without having to scrounge for counter space. I have my house back and I feel so much better.
May 19, 2012 10-1pm Paper Crafting Class " Magnetic Mini Album"
Victor Starffin - Tokyo Giants
Tribal courts and federal courts have concurrent jurisdiction over several felonies classified in the Major Crimes Act, including murders and rapes, that occur on reservations. If federal prosecutors decline prosecution in those cases, tribal officials don’t always receive investigative information from federal agencies, making it difficult to prosecute the crimes in tribal court. The Tribal Law and Order Act requires the Department of Justice to file reports to tribal justice officials explaining why cases aren’t being prosecuted federally to coordinate the prosecution of crimes on reservations.
To avoid memories, I decide to take walks somewhere I don’t have any memories of Odie which is like 20 minutes away with the car. Everywhere I take a step has its own memory, the dog had such a personality that he had basically marked every spot in this small village. Where he wanted to have som sweets (when he ran and pushed his pawns on the back of your knee so you fall forwards), where he didn’t want to walk (because he was bored of that certain place), where he had to take a swim (basically all the beautiful views and nice walks here), where he knew there was an appletree (the dog loved his apples and knew about them all), where he wanted to change direction (because he felt that he wasn’t finished with the walk although we had been out walking for 2 hours), or where he decided to stop and stare (physically stop and stare out in the blue). It hurts too much to walk where I can think of him even though I know that I need to go through it because I wont let him go in otherwise. Well, that is what it feels like. Does that mean that I am scared of memories or just that I have a hard time saying good bye? And when are you supposed to say good bye?
Mean or defaming comments – comments that hurt and scar. I simply don’t understand how some people can be so mean, so calculating, so slanderous. Cruelty doesn’t make sense to me. And don’t get me started on liars.
Jachelle: Yeah, Stannis, you definitely need to DIAF. I can’t wait to see all of this blow up in your friggen face.
Fried rosella leaves $7.50
Andy insists it’s like the best anime ever, and his last recommendation (Steins Gate) was worth it, so I’ll give this one a shot. Also, this was listed in the most popular anime, so it might actually be good?
We also have unwanted visitors in droves in the form of dandelions. Jos has been going through the garden digging them out by the deepest part of their roots to ensure they cannot return. In doing so he broke our little trowel. It was one with a cheap plastic handle. He did his own make do and mend by getting a branch from the woods in just the right diameter to use as a new handle for now...
Sprinkle chicken breasts with salt and pepper. Place in the pan and brown well on both sides, about 7 minutes per side. Remove from pan and keep warm.
of the two-faced flag, to save Spain.
RED ….The color of our root chakra located at the base of the spine and allows us to be grounded and connect to the universal energies.. RED ….energizing, burning. RED color of poison, strength and aggression …RED…..Warm scented metallic taste of blood.
Mix flour through brown sugar in a large bowl. In a medium bowl mix oil through vanilla. Mix wet into dry and whisk to combine. Cook on griddle until done. Serve with maple syrup or whipped cream... or both!
I'm still going to send out a set of these photographs to a lucky camper at the end of the event, but have also decided to add a "mid-event" drawing Monday, Feb. 8th for an additional set of these photos... IF the Saints come through with a big win tomorrow night! So, everybody, put on your black and gold and give a big cheer. GEAUX SAINTS!!!!
One is on a head pin, then it’s threaded though the link, and another bead is added. I then cut off most of the excess wire and make a loop to keep the beads fastened to the chain.
But it still really hurts when I see my baby sister talking about going to her house for dinner tonight.
Research Paper
Malcolm offering advice on Elaine’s White Pine
... just sayin'. It's been a whole month since I've posted on this blog! At least I have a good excuse... October is OBVIOUSLY reserved for all things creepy, and therefore I was posting more on my HauntedDesignHouse blog :) But now that THE BEST HOLIDAY EVER is now over for the year, I guess it is time to start doing a little sumpin' sumpin' over here ;)
There are __ postures that I feel are essential to learn:
for a place like this.”
Private resources and public good
In spite of the failure of the 1994 predictions, Family Radio didn’t self-destruct… and Harold Camping didn’t change his tune. As the years went by up to 2011, he became even more idiosyncratic and even more sure of himself that THIS time he had the dates right. And he drug Family Radio along with him.
Instead of Phys. Ed. I was riding my bike with my brothers or friends every day, and hiking in the woods with my dad and my dog. Instead of English class, I read Jack London and Anne Rice and Shakespeare (among countless others), and when I was twelve I wrote a two hundred page Adventure novel with characters based on friends. I then got myself a copy of the current writers and illustrators market and learned about how to get a book edited and published. Instead of science, I watched the Crocodile Hunter religiously, I read the origin of species, and numerous zoology books from the library, and then I went outside and hunted down frogs, salamanders,turtles, snakes, I taught myself how to identify them, and where they lived. I had the time for many "Extra-curricular activities" such as volunteering at the library, horseback riding, martial arts classes, training my dog, tye dying tee shirts, going to music festivals, museums, or
Will you make me whole
As you near the end of the filter, make sure to keep the bottom of the flower tight, as the top will start to get loose.
But I’m beginning
Despite the myth that Canada didn’t have a housing bubble, the evidence is that they did. However, their house prices rallied and then leveled off. Japan (in green) continues its pace of steady deflation.
We moved to England when I was 7 months pregnant with Rebecca, and I remember, so vividly, that last long week of waiting . . . and how the days seemed to be suspended, caught in amber, dragged out into long golden twilight.
(and yes, it did make me google predicament because I didn't realize a predicament, although the word does conjure up dire images of maidens tied to railroad tracks ... that could just be me from too many years watching Underdog or Bullwinkle or Mighty Mouse or whatever that was ... is that much different than a problem)
My team got destroyed. Obliterated. My 24 point lead has become a 67 point humiliation, and to top it off the teams placed third and fourth have clawed their way back and are three and seven points behind me respectively.
Recommendations by the Department of Health were two-fold: 1) to use standardized techniques for lamb castration, and 2) to wash their hands thoroughly after contact with animals. I might also respectfully suggest brushing one’s teeth as well, or perhaps using a mouthwash. As a public service to all I also leave you with these Google Video links, but remember once you go and look at them, you can never un-look at them.
Instructor: Barb Switzer
We had a lovely Easter with family. Egg hunts had to take place indoors because of the wet weather but we still had lots of fun! Isabelle's not back to school until next week so it's been interesting trying to keep her entertained!
- People from out-of-city will be able to purchase a wristband after March 9 for $180.
It’s Saturday morning and I just slept until 9am. I had forgotten what sleep felt like. It is fucking glorious, if you’re wondering.
Simply put – go back to a simpler time and think before you tweet or update your company’s social media presences. Doesn't anyone remember what happened to Imus?
Individual habit plays a big role, too. Two print newspapers show up on my doorstep every morning. Each Saturday, when I haul what must be 20 pounds of paper to the recycling bin, I’m reminded of the environmental costs. I own several e-readers and get news on them, too, but I am still finding the print habit hard to break.
Nate: Yeah!
Somerville, Siobhan B.. “Feminism, Queer Theory and the Racial Closet.” 52.2 (2010): 191 – 200. Criticism. Web. 1 Apr. 2012.
I just made Amaretto Shortbread from Baking Bites - or at least I almost did. I had to leave out the lemon zest as Martin's stepdad saw my lemon in the fruitbowl and thought 'Ooh! Gin and tonic!' Grr. It still tastes good though!
“According to official documents, Jeremy Hunt spent five days in the US holding meetings with News Corp at the same point Rupert and James Murdoch were first deciding whether to bid for Sky, reports the Guardian’s David Leigh and Vikram Dodd. Almost immediately after Hunt’s trip, James Murdoch visited David Cameron in London, and privately told him that News Corp had agreed to switch support to the Tories in the upcoming election. Hunt then became culture secretary in the victorious Tory government.”
I can't deny myself the pure bliss of gritt under my nails and dirt stained hands.
the hearts beating in stone.
SSF and sperm competition are complementary, so that for the multiple males engaging in sexual intercourse with the female, their bodies produce genetically superior and more fertile sperm, to compete with the sperm of the other males, as well as greater quantities of it, increasing the likelihood of impregnation. It is almost as if the testicles know that the SSF has been or will be activated and therefore makes the best sperm it can so that the SSF ends up picking its sperm over that of other men.
JUSTIN: Didn't you do something similar with Dennis Hopper?
I do want to add that I really understood something between these two incredibly loving energies. They are of the same council. One housed here on earth, one housed in the Pleiades. Together they form the “Counsel of Ascending Light” on earth. Together, they directly work with the magnetics within our DNA, and all that is involved with that. As were the ancient Mayan. Like we are becoming… the ancient Mayan’s were the living embodiment of these two pure energies/consciousness.
The look of an outfit can be changed immediately with jewelry. I don't wear a watch when traveling, my phone tells me the time.
Hope you are all having a wonderful week. See you soon!
And it’s simple to see why Jews have been in the forefront of seeing that White ethnic consciousness or nationalism is dead and buried forever.
Vertically we had 28 1/2” and we wanted two buttons per column so we divided by 3 and got 9 1/2”.
NOTE: he doesn’t really discuss what to me is the most interesting part until 1hr 7 minutes in, namely about ‘ideological subversion’; this in regards as to how there was a concerted effort over many decades to subvert US culture. Factoid: 15% spent on intelligence, 85% spent on propaganda, ideological warfare etc., i.e. to change perception of reality, or a ‘brainwashing process’ in 4 stages:
So, hopefully this time will be a success.
TheVendy only asked a few selected members on what their opinion is on lowering the voting age to 16. Ruth respectively said that discussion on lowering the voting age should be done away from the heat and the light of the Independence Referendum. She was the only one who said that people who voted in the Scottish elections should be the ones voting in the Independence Referendum; something that went down well with TheVendy’s journalists.
There was also much appreciation for the differences in each other’s faiths. When Radhanath Swami spoke of extending love beyond national boundaries, beyond racial boundaries, and even beyond the boundaries of species—perhaps delicately hinting at the benefits of a more compassionate diet—Dr. West very much appreciated the point and picked up on the hint.
Any questions you'd like me to answer in the comments?
4) I started kindergarten when I was 4, and got kicked out within 12 weeks. I thought they had made a mistake and put me in the Special Ed class, so to be helpful, I went around doing all the other kids' classwork for them. The school board recommended to my parents that I be promoted to 3rd grade, and go to a special school for gifted kids at a local university. Instead, my parents put me in to a private religious school. Not that I am bitter.
Imagine you have been thrown back to the 1300′s. Sounds fascinating, right? Of course it does. But, what would you wear? What would you eat? What would you do? Where would you go to the…. Well, you get my drift.
I examined the issue of what the officers, in fact, did in police custody regarding criminal suspects who are mentally ill. The findings from my research have influenced my thinking on this subject. I want to share that with you.
We had no flakes, no disasters, and didn't get kicked out of any locations! Yay!
I started reading about what having gestational diabetes means. Gestational diabetes (GD) is caused by hormones put into the mother's blood stream by the baby's placenta that create insulin resistance. As the placenta increases in size so does the amount of hormone produced. The mother may need up to three times as much insulin to regulate her blood sugar during her last trimester. If her pancreas can't increase insulin to meet the demands of her body glucose builds up in her blood stream resulting in GD. Generally the placenta doesn't produce enough hormone to effect insulin levels until the third trimester. Most testing is done between 24-28 weeks.
Dr OtherRandomDude
I've been thinking a lot about success lately.
Men had to act fast, else they got eaten by large, quicker things.
Sherpani
Similarly, churches must give attention to their corporate persona. Do the local folks perceive that they care? Every community has broken marriages, disoriented kids, hungry families, and rebellious teens. Does the church condemn the sin and dysfunction of the fallen, or does it demonstrate care by providing loving counsel and modeling authentic discipleship? Serving the needs of the fallen is more demanding than condemning their choices, but it goes much further in creating the possibility for a genuine hearing of the Word.
Unexpectedly, this one is my favorite! If I got this haircut, I would be losing something like two feet of hair! Might have to get a keratin treatment to pull this off. Lots of maintenance. Hmmm. Maybe I am talking myself out of this one.
60s songs and Brit pop hits was this week’s theme, guided by the great Steve Van Zandt of Springsteen’s E Street Band.
Thursday evening:
This blog series explores the lives of Ley ancestors as revealed in their obituaries. Much of this information was gathered during a March 2011 research trip to Tuscarawas and Harrison counties in Ohio. A scan of the obituary is available at the bottom of this post.
D has entered that phase we all dread, known as the "make up your own jokes and subject everyone around you to them" phase. Without further explanation necessary, here are three from the last half hour:
This weekend we went for a picnic and Omri had what we had (bread, hummus and veggies) but we also had some things just for us. Daddy had olives and Wasbi Peas and I had some sushi.
-Kim
Loud disco spilled out of it with cold
There are two signed copies to be won as well as a few signed bookplates and bookmarks for consolation prizes which features Cindy's Chinese Brush Art. And if you have never seen Cindy's brush art, go here and be in awe of her talent!
1 loaf of stale bread watered and squeezed dry.
You see – and here’s where the tricky bit comes in – one of the Lagers (promised I wouldn’t identify to protect the guilty – but here’s a subtle clue; Oestrogen) WAS able to get the key into the lock. WAS able to turn key in lock. WAS also able to turn handle. WAS NOT able to perform both activities simultaneously. Remained on wrong side of threshold. Stayed at Mother-in-Laws place for the night instead.
The first group of 11 officers (a married couple, 4 single women and 5 single men) sailed on August 12, 1917. Evangeline charged them: “You are going overseas to serve Christ. You must forget yourselves, be examples of His love, willing to endure hardship, to lay down your lives, if need be, for His sake. In your hands you hold the honour of The Salvation Army and the glory of Jesus Christ…. Anyone failing will be shot! She concluded, “I promise you nothing. I don’t know what you will get into, it may be life, it may be death; it may be sickness, it may be loss – I promise you nothing!”
Give a good, brand new Constitutionalist a Second and a Tenth with a dash of First and you've got yourself a deal, good buddy: America, rightwing style.
In 2012 Q1, Spanish economic activity continued on the declining path initiated in the closing months of 2011, in a setting of high financial tension. On the as-yet incomplete information available, the contraction in GDP is estimated to have been slightly higher than that in 2011 Q4, with a quarter-on-quarter rate of change of -0.4%. National demand fell once again (-0.9 pp), as has been the case over the past four years, although the decline was milder than in the preceding quarter, while the contribution of net external demand was positive once more (0.6 pp), but likewise lower than that in the previous three months. After posting rises for seven consecutive quarters in year-on-year terms, GDP fell back to a rate of -0.5% (0.3% in the previous quarter).
HP: Would you ever consider becoming a traditionally published author?
If you’ve been reading my blog for any length of time, you know I really can’t resist when a teacher story is in the news.
ps. kudos if you’re still awake/alive if you made it through this. kind of ironic when I spend half the time talking about life… oof.
Fang came to prominence when he was dismissed as vice president of the University of Science and Technology of China in Hefei and was expelled from the Communist Party of China in January 1987, after making speeches urging reform.
Especially when you decide to a) displace your shortstop of the future (some dude named Jose Reyes, wonder what he’s up to these days) for this guy and this same guy b) wears a 1986 championship ring in his press junket coming to the United States.
If you are interested in advertising your blog, Etsy shop, or company on the sidebar of my blog, tell me about it!
This is from the 2007 JCS ornament issue. The designer is Designs by Cathy Jean using the recommended fabric and floss.
I submitted my last retakes for NBC and am studying for the assessment center exercises.
My head is still there. Did I mention I had a great time? I swear, the pub is the absolute best thing Man (probably Woman, though, if you think about it) has ever invented. I adore pubs. Cozy, comfy, no pressure, no worries about seeing and being seen, you just go with whoever you want (or a book) and have a nice pint of summat. Pubs. They should be a legal requirement every mile. The world would be a better place with more pubs.
To most people, Ed says, Nadya may have appeared to be in control—but not to him. “I know my daughter,” he says. “When she’s under tremendous physical pain, it’s very hard to tell.”
I also had incredible times of praise and worship and love the deeper communion with my Lord and Savior. So thank you for hanging with me. Back to mommy blogging this week.
We should not pity ourselves nor should we want to be pitied by others. I won’t allow the fact that my parents never went to college to be a reason to believe that I cannot receive a degree. I won’t allow the past sins I have engaged in to detour my ability to fully serve the Lord. I won’t allow my past misconceptions about love to determine how I love others. Even as I love, I pray to always love with the love of Christ. I won’t even allow my old passion for medicine to modify the pursuit of happiness in any career God has for me. And ultimately, I won’t allow the lies of the enemy in the past to steal the joy, prosperity, and dominance given to me by the Lord. Haven’t you heard? The past is gone and the new is here (2 Corinthians 5:17) !
Pratyush stands there, completely blown up by surprise. He holds Mahek’s hand for sometime and tries to speak something. But he appears to be too happy to suppress the joy and rather than saying anything he just moves his hand on Mahek’s head. He just says: ‘Lets go’.
Over breakfast he explained.
As a point, I agree that the media and the education sector tend to enforce the rabid partisanship in our country. However, these institutions are heavily influenced by corporate ideals and policies because not only is the media run by corporations, thus compromising their supposedly objective reporting, but colleges and universities are for-profit institutions that are out to secure business. In other words, they’re business friendly and their pursuit of knowledge is thus compromised. Rabid partisanship appears to me to be a red herring and more than anything it appears to be socially manufactured because both the Democratic and Republican parties advocate this kind of corporatizing of our culture and politics.
In other news:
The animation doesn’t seem to be a letdown either. It gets bright and colorful when it needs to, but gets dark and the representation looks great. I think it’s also worth the mention here the representation when he gets a nightmare about the bullies and the pities he receives from everyone because of his looks and partly his attitude. It was artistically good, and it made me look forward for more.
Truthfully I didn’t know very much about Thich besides his Wikipedia page and the description I’d heard from my mother, so I wasn’t sure who to expect. But when a slight, wrinkled man spoke to us on the first night in a cadence so measured and weighty that I thought at first he was reciting a poem, it seemed very natural. Of course he was like this. But gradually I became aware of something more that he was. There was something being said in the way he arranged his robe over his knees, sitting cross-legged in front of 700 people waiting in a hush for him to speak, there was something poignant and real that happened after he ended a sentence, and looked calmly around at all of us. We went for “walking meditations,” where 700 people would walk through nature in small, measured steps following Thich in silence, and often I walked near him. There was something in the way he moved one foot in front of the other and greeted the earth with his slippers, and in the way he sat down on the grass, and drank a cup of tea, while everyone kneeled in a circle around him, somehow everyone quietly pleading speak prophet, speak! And in the way he said nothing, and moved his face to beam upon all of those in the crowd, he was speaking. He was emanating tranquility, some ancient natural essence. I don’t know quite how to describe it, but I suppose what he had was an incredible presence, like an aura. I’ve never experienced it before, but there was some kind of energy moving through the air in his presence. When I was near him, or even watching him, something in me was satiated and quieted, and I flushed more fully into the earth.
“Thank you. I think.” I couldn’t help smiling. Betty was the only one I knew who spoke the truth without holding back. She didn’t tip-toe around stuff. Very different from my family. Tip-toeing was what we did best.
3 pieces of cooked bacon (preferably maple cured), roughly chopped
@ MessageToEagle.com based on material provided by MIT
"Dead." Yes, I knew he was but it came so quickly and, once again, it fills me with sadness.
This kind of non-monoticity derives from the fact that practical commitments can be incompatible with one another. This means that even if our desires and the norms we are bound by (our practical inferential commitments) are not directly incompatible (which they can be), variations in our theoretical commitments can mean that the practical commitments we infer from them are. For example, I may desire both to remain dry, and to remain safe, and these are usually incompatible. But in a lightning storm my desire to remain dry will license me to open my umbrella (i.e., (a)), while my desire to remain safe will compel me not to. In these cases one inference must trump the other. If I prefer safety to dryness, then the theoretical commitment ‘I am in a lightning storm’ thereby counts as a defeasor to (a). The possibility of direct and indirect incompatibilities between our practical inferential commitments is the key to both the nature of value and the relation between types of correctness. It is the key to the former because it reveals the possibility of relational practical inferential commitments:-
Detailed notes on yields
73/205/170/148 and they want you under 95/180/155/140...so I failed all but one...to me the numbers don't mean much right now, they 'look' not awful...but I feel I just kept trying to sugar coat everything.
I cooked it the way his mother cooked pot roast.
I thought I should perhaps check if anything the size of a bus had fallen on London while I was in the cinema watching the glorious founding of the Chinese Communist Party in The Beginning of the Great Revival so I got a London Evening Standard (which is now owned, like the Independent newspaper, by an ex-KGB man).
Pick a good, manly colored wide marker. Pick a couple manly colors in another style of marker that will match your wide marker. For this first example I'm using R27 and a 100 Black. Carefully touch the black marker to the tip of your wide marker, holding them there for a while until the color seeps onto the wide marker.
don’t the dots
-the time my rabbit died & I hilariously said, “Oooh he’s all stiff” (I would say the same again years later on my wedding night);
style of art (he has seen Jake's own work) and he always lets it be known that
God, I haven't had any since I used to listen to Twisted Sister and the rest of the poodle rock brigade (Poison, Mötley Crüe) back in the 80s. I don't have any guilty pleasures because I don't have any guilty feelings.
Unfortunately, for the most part, they were very much like the current crop of veteran advertising people -- they had opinions about everything and knowledge about nothing.
Because I come from the land of plenty?"
Bible costume are so wonderfully easy I can them in make two in two day. They are a such a simple pattern.
Been anywhere nice on your holidays, Brian? Morphou? Lovely in October, isn't it?
Regular readers comment on Stan’s stories, and this gives him courage and validation—two of the things he needs to venture forth and find his lady love. And we’re all pulling for him to do just that, although none of the women he finds seems good enough for him, with his cutting wit and his sensitive heart and his big dick and his hot-air balloon of a spirit.
2) Make another of the same cricut cut using patterned paper (you need 1 patterned paper cut for every 2 cards you are making), then cut this piece in half lengthwise. Trim 3/8" from the straight edge.
The roof I have my plants on can get really hot in the summer heat, they are exposed to the sun all day long. I will need to remember to water them well. I’m waiting for my plants to recover from the soil being to moist before I get back on the schedule of watering them every morning. I suspect I will be able to start that again on Friday.
Today is confusion, pain, despair.
so was my first trip Saturday to Chattanooga.
between the street and frozen lake
Dc – double crochet
Taxing the rich simply because you dont like how much they make and are jealous of their success is no way to live your life. The country is broke and in need of severe cuts. More taxes doesnt solve the issue it only perpetuates it.
i liked the first video i made much better (everything is easier to see) but it
Message:
I thought about this discussion in comparison with other seder discussions I've had, especially with children present (there was also another boy there of about 11, who didn't say much during this part of the discussion but was definitely following what was being said). I've been at other seders where parents of children have changed the subject abruptly because they didn't want their children to be exposed to talk about violence and murder (even though both are part of the biblical Passover story). But at this seder no one shrank from discussing the moral issues raised by violence. I can't help but think that our being in Israel helped to shape this discussion. Here, children are aware of violence from an early age, and the parents I know have not tried to shield their children from knowledge of it. They talk to their children about it and do their best to prevent them from being governed by fear - but they don't try to pretend that it doesn't exist.
The International Judaic (that hidden hand – satan’s collaborators) will of course broadly advertise that ‘peace’ has finally come home, and that it is the few remaining ‘confused and stubborn’ Christians, who refuse to worship worldly idols, who are the troublemakers. Watch the news with a hawks eye, for this will be done subtly through the worldwide mass media, which these vipers so shrewdly control. Why is the Hollywood star and activist George Clooney suddenly so interested in Sudan? Where was Hollywood, CBS News, the BBC, etc. when the conflict was at its peak, and when Islamic radicals were butchering Christian woman and children by the 1000’s????
the lamb of God who takes away the sins of the world
If you love summer, you'll love it even more! Along for the Ride gave me just enough of everything I want. The setting is beautiful, the characters are likable. The story is emotional with lots of drama and it deals with the issues about family, friendship, love and even death. They will keep you turning the pages and reading more... wanting more... Who wouldn't want a summer on the beach, with new found friendships and a blossoming romance with a cute boy? I love Eli and I love Auden. I still think about them often and I feel happy every time.
Would those have been the regulations and taxes put in by your union friends Rick?
Last month the militias were paid Z$3 trillion – that is 30 cents in the new
1/3 cup sugar
I am really.
“I raced smart, and I think that’s what it was,” Start said. “I wanted to be smooth, I wanted to be consistent, and I wanted to take care of my tires in the first race and I think I did. I watched the other guys and there were some moves where I was like, you guys are nuts. You guys are going to scrub your tires.
Sunday was a small bridal expo down the Cape with my cousin Kristin and our friend. Then some delicious Mexican food for lunch! The mansion that housed the bridal expo was absolutely GORGEOUS! I wish that we had been able to poke around more. I also wish that the valet hadn't scared the bejeepers out of me - making me forget my phone in the car. So, no pictures. :-( However, getting to spend some quality time with two of my favorite people totally made up for it!
Now onto our challenge for May.
Just Plain Tired
a. A whip
As always, don’t hesitate to contact me if you have any questions or to set up a free consultation.
I hate the bus. Mine is the first stop in the morning and the last stop in the afternoon. It feels like I spend an eternity bouncing around on those hard black seats.
Peter looks down at the wriggling son of god, "why don't you just heal yourself?"
I'm looking forward to new scenarios and new units, and I can't wait to see this game in the fall! Who else will be playing some OGRE come November?
you gave me five good reasons to believe
Children . . . right. Well, that's been covered, hasn't it? Adoption and surrogacy are currently out of equation for us, but maybe at some point. Trying for another pregnancy is not going well and there is a point at which we have to ask ourselves - given the high risk nature of things - how worthwhile it is to pursue this avenue.
the door of today, where a new world
The way I see it, metrosexuality is another sign of power and wealth. Men who are able to give themselves the King treatment -lavish grooming at the salon, and always wearing the latest trend- must certainly have a high income, otherwise are in a gigantic debt. These men are often self-centered and egocentric -as I mentioned above; in other words, simple-minded men. The male figure of the typical simple-minded woman who is only worried about her beauty and takes part in all sorts of surgeries to better herself (or at least she thinks so) It’s all very false, how they live for the physical appearance. I can imagine the Beckham’s practicing different poses; how to smile, walk, sit, turn their head, etc. It’s all the same with those high society men in the Baroque era, who wore jewelry and make-up. Being delicate, well dress, etc, was a sign of the aristocracy; men with money because their ancestors had money, and son on, again, a sign of power. They all seemed superficial and hypocrites, arrogant with the commoners, and poor. We tend to hate (hate is another way of fearing) what seems like a threat to us or what is our nature. Most likely I am wrong in my way of thinking (perhaps bias by the ideals society has implanted in my head) however, this is certainly something to think about. We are labeled by society into being something in specific, and when we depart from the idea of what we should be, then we turn into an outcast, a pariah of society.
I will be picking Aley up from the airport when she gets back.
This week's challenge is set by the lovely VICKY. She has chosen a theme of:-
“I was only joking,” he says. Wistfully.
I feel that everyone will keep looking for their own sources that make sense to them, and reject what does not appeal to them.
Everyone of us has something for which to be thankful. It helps, I think, to recall the chaos, suffering, deprivation that has marked your life so that power can be given the thanks you raise in prayer on Thanksgiving Day. For there is wisdom to be discovered from the crosses we are asked to carry in life.
Your efforts must be targeted and 1. consistent. Getting your assistant to send out invitations to all of her friends on Facebook is a recipe for disaster. First, these people will not fit your ideal demographic, allowing your well-thought-out communications to fall on deaf ears. Second, as a result of your new-found “friends,” Facebook will constrain your social community to 23-year-olds who like Camaros, determining that these are the folks with whom you want to communicate. Facebook will do everything it can to reinforce this demographic as it recommends new friends to you.
Rising and changing of cinnamon and dough,
Dear The Sun,
himself every time Rowan comes within five feet of
Live a life extraordinary with me
Boomers may dress for success still but father time is creeping up on them. Companies are doing their best to allow boomers to age gracefully, keeping their dignity intact. WJS.com reported, “Kimberly-Clark spent two years overhauling its Depend brand, anticipating boomers would demand changes to the image and design of a line long considered too diaper-like and institutional. By 2020, Kimberly-Clark expects 45 million boomers will need incontinence products, up from 38 million currently.”
Men marched asleep. Many had lost their boots
Second part of my report....
I have been testing out recipes for Christmas and these are my current favourite. Batches and batches of florentines have been coming out the kitchen with different nuts and fruit in it. The red chilli in these gives them a little kick and makes them look especially festive!
A business card
The reason I talk to myself is because I am the only one whose answers I accept. -George Carlin
This post is part of a synchroblog on Theology and human rights. The topic was suggested by Phil Wyman, the originator of the synchroblog concept, but I’ve already said most of what I want to say on the theological basis for human rights in an earlier post here. Links to the other posts in the synchroblog are posted below. If you have a post in the synchroblog, please copy the list , and paste it at the end of your post. The list will be updated if other entries are received.
You’re dead, I’m vindicated.
Such depictions are radioactive as many Muslims believe that Islamic teachings forbid showing images of Muhammad.
Email me at ambern1984@yahoo.com with what you are interested in and I'll let you know if it's still available. Once they have been paid for I'll cross them off here.
Albeit just a few hundred words, the feature was interesting, not least to discover that Mr. Knievel (that sounds so wrong, like calling Big Daddy the wrestler Mr. Daddy) went from fame and fortune, getting $6 Million for a show at Wembley in 1975, to being bankrupt just two years later.
Leave muffins in tin for 5 minutes before lifting out to wire rack to cool
My heart going boom boom boom
In stating the above I have found a few blogs I like through Entrecard that I do read and comment on. I've added a few blogs to my blog roll and have followed some others. But it's a small minority compared to the number I simply drop and run on.
Words and ideas - Robbie Boland.
I didn't break out the chronograph, but considering the plastic-fantastic ammo is carrying a full load of powder behind a ten grain slick plastic bullet, I can guess these projectiles are approaching 4000fps. At speeds anything like that, bullet disintegration is more than possible.
I went on one of my favorite sites tonight (Luxurylaunches.com) and coincidentally came upon an article which had the cars that the rich drive. I will be thinking of the second richest woman in the world tomorrow as I continue my search for the “perfect” Impala. My logic tells me I have one week to find a car, and if I haven’t found one by the last day, I’m going to buy a bottle of cheap wine, drink the whole thing, and then pick the first one I like.
Or better still, that no one decent does and responsibilities are shared out between current members of the department. I could cope with a bit of responsibility, just not the whole lot.
When is a milkshake not a milkshake? And when is a smoothie not a smoothie? These are the important worldly questions I ponder as I bask in the afterglow of a recent creation, which blurs the lines and cheekily winks at me in the gray area between the two commonly accepted definitions.
Roosevelt Island Operating Corp Advisories Group Information was confirmed by NYPD Press Spokesperson
lesotho_tradition
‘I never kent his name. But the names o’ the two selchies with him were Geira and Hancie.’
1350 *D-IV/29/2000. “Emily Dickinson and the Demise of Death.” Seminar, Lenoir-Rhyne College Hickory Humanities Forum, Wildacres Conference Center, Little Switzerland, North Carolina. (Incorporated in Item C-2002(2), above, pp. 22-29.)
"I don't ever want to play weak characters," says SYLVESTER STALLONE. "I want to show people in films that they can do or accomplish anything they want, if they really want it bad enough." And Sly is doing just that in his newest film F.I.S.T., a story of a powerful union official.
In the feeling of home
This was my moment. There was a clear space between the first wave of celebrities and the rest of us. A new uniformed guard and chic Parisienne dressed in black bracing a clipboard between her hip and forearm appeared at the top of the steps. I bolted through the crowd, business card outstretched and said to the guard: Bonjour, Monsieur, and pleaded in English, not trusting my French at a moment like this, I am an American writer for A Woman’s Paris™, I do not have an invitation to Maxime’s show. I have just arrived.
This card is simple! With only a couple of mats and a Basic Pearl for embellishment, the rest is all stamped. I used a clear block to create the textured background, and my one of my (many!) favourite stamp sets "My Friend". This card was another made in under ten minutes!
So finally, we are out the door, after getting the bookbag and the purse and the key and the phone and the drum kit (yes, she is the coolest of the band geeks - a drummer) and the lunch box (which is too big and too red)....and now we are on the front porch where she promptly asks me to drive her the one block to her friend's house "because it's too cold, mom!". And of course, being the loving mommy pushover that I am, I give in. I drive her one block (remember it's 5:30am, I don't want to be awake either!). And then do I get a kiss goodbye? Do I get a hug? Do I get any acknowledgement at all that I am even alive???? Do I really need to answer that?
Yesterday my dinner plans got derailed by a couple of kids that weren't feeling too hot. Instead of eating the Bacon and Gouda Stuffed Pork Chops I had planned, we decided to go a bit easier on there stomachs. My favorite type of comfort food is Chicken and Dumplings, but the last thing I wanted to do was spend an afternoon over the stove while dealing with sick kids. I gave my slow cooker, Blaze, another chance to help us out and whipped up a big pot of Easy Chicken and Dumplings.
10. went to Tivoli and saw Medina perform! Tivoli is an amusement park and garden. DisneyWorld was inspired by Tivoli. It was a small but quaint amusement park! I love it so much. It just seems like a nice place to have a date. And when we went, the lines went quickly, so that was nice. The rides there are a little bit more intense though and can last longer than you’d think. There was this one ride where I felt super nauseous for a good amount of time. I felt better after consuming food (churros and Belgian waffles lol) A couple of the rides closed down due to strong winds though. The garden is beautiful. There’s even a peacock roaming around. I had the opportunity to see it. It was so weird to see it chilling on a bush in front of a restaurant. And Medina is very good live. It makes me want to actively search for concerts and go to them. It was such a good day minus the smokers standing to my right during the concert.
If DC abruptly went insane and suddenly signed over all rights to the original creators the result in sales would likely remain the same. The die-hard fans will buy it, the scans will be shared world-wide and the exposure to the product will ensure that any licensing and marketing deals they signed will be lucrative. The comic books of today, in whatever format they find a reader, are little more than periodical advertisements for future media projects anyways. Comics long ago stopped being the product in and of itself and became sales pitches and ads the consumer pays for, like t-shirts with product logos printed on them. Whatever the future holds for the Watchmen cast can be predicted but not with any real accuracy. Technology almost guarantees that there will be an Watchmen animated series in the future and digital comics are, once the business models get smoothed out, only going to gain in popularity (though the digital form wipes out the collector market and the only cache in "collecting" those would be an artificially created desire to be "first" or in receiving limited edition serials restricted to a limited market).
yay!!! it turns out the one sign of jealousy that oliver has exhibited since miles arrived works out extremely well in my favor.
I spent a little time cleaning out and reorganizing,
“That ain’t fair, she started it!” said Olivia.
That's another thing Rosie doesn't know: that 1:40 a.m. is sleep time, not play time.
You should print an apology in your paper acknowledging that this cartoon was ignorant, offensive and racist and should not have been printed.
When the very people you turn to for support invalidate, it is painful…….When a parent invalidates and fails to protect a small child, it’s devastating. Over and over I have experienced invalidation, especially from my parents-the two people on this Earth who are supposed to love me unconditionally, care for me, and cherish my very existence. I have spent my whole life seeking the validation I have so needed. I have repeated my requests, I have tried and tried and failed repeatedly. Time after time I think, “This time they will understand. This time they will get it.” Time after time I am painfully reminded that they will not.
Only worth living if somebody is loving you
If David Cameron turns out to be all that Conservative members hope, the Liberal Democrats may decide to try the same trick themselves one day.As that was written two years before Nick became leader, and only six months after he was first elected to Westminster, I find that quite impressive.
Jeff is the only one doing something different. I bought him ImmunExtra capsules last summer and he has been taking them ever since. Several times he has felt like he is coming down with something (runny nose, etc), and the next day he is symptom free. When Jeff gets sick it usually hits him hard so to have symptoms for a day or less is a miracle.
Aubrey has done better with the terrible two's after a week or two of some serious breakdowns (that includes child and parents, lol). I was so confused as to whether he was ill, hurting, or actually throwing a fit since he has been a happy, easy going child up until this point. (I even had an email typed to send to some of my friends who have degrees in Family and Child Studies as a cry for help in figuring out what was going on! lol) I soon realized that it WAS actually a frustration/power struggle he was dealing with. I had friends of ours laugh when I told them what was going on and our troubles. Some just laughed and replied, "Yeah, that's typical. Welcome to parenthood". After trying different approaches, we have been able to minimize the emotional breakdowns and handle the situations better. PTL! Now, we are praying more often for wisdom on this parenting journey.
Reich: yes rich people and corporations have
a. Eaten the pie!
I am working REALLY hard to squeeze in a little time here and there for baking, even when that means that I have to sacrifice my sleep time, but it's worth it! In fact, I made some cake last week, which took me no less than two weeks to finish, but anything is better than nothing. Will post that one up soon. Have a blessed week!
Today's Just-the-Right-Layout, the Little Guy getting his library card!
My girls absolutely love every detail from the handmade flower to the bakers twine shoe bows, but I think its a bit ugly - without being sure it is in the "pretty ugly" category. Maybe its the mismatched eyeballs or the idea that mummy wrappings would ever come in 80's pink and lime green, whatever is up with this card it has left me a bit unsettled and wondering who I could give it to. Perhaps a frienemy?
8And the voice which I heard from heaven spake unto me again, and said, Go and take the little book which is open in the hand of the angel which standeth upon the sea and upon the earth.
Lesson #4 Do NOT allow the Spirit of offense because of #3!Yes, this lesson is one of the harder ones to swallow simply because it’s not a grand feeling to be told you were wrong or you need to get your facts straight. Getting offended does nothing to allow growth. As a matter of fact the spirit of offense stunts growth and well need I say more. Take the lesson for what it’s worth and GROW.
In the aftermath of the student protests in London the Met Police Commissioner Sir Paul Stephenson said he blamed
Canada Day’s Eve
GO EAGLES!
He Who instituted the Sacrament of the Eucharist was none other than Our Lord Jesus Christ, Whose body and blood are present under the appearance of bread and wine. This is My Body… This is My Blood… These words are clear and direct, without any figures or metaphors. They state and should be thus understood that this is His true Body and Blood. The “Bible-only” sectarians would have “transubstantiation” (and other Catholic dogmas) literally written but this literal rational signification they reject simply because they take Our Lord’s words figuratively or metaphorically; but, by whose divine authority do they say that it must be taken as they would have it, where in their version is it literally written by the Evangelist: “Do not take the words to the letter”? Whoever would say otherwise would injure the Lord by not believing His words or by doubting His divine power.
I jump, I fly, I feel immortal
Within reason, the more details about the settings the author provides, the more the reader is able to inhabit the world of that moment of the story.
Purple: Ribbon, Background Tag and the Folded Dahlia Flower
Who finding the first wrinkles on a face
Who: Joey
Now as far as EV2 goes, he dares us to call them Wrestlers. He calls what they do “Hardcore” well, try to survive a plane crash, then they call themselves “Hardcore”.
Just leave me a comment on this POST
We have visited the park, went to the one in Congleton mainly because our son had an appointment at the hospital there, so we thought we would take them to the park there for an hour before the appointment, then home, they made pizzas with EJ’s daddy before having tea, then it was time for me to pump up the air bed, EJ decided she would sleep on it with Olivia, mainly because it was a double airbed and it can fit them both on, so thats what they did.
Original Air Date: Mar 13, 2012
And then it returned on or about December 19, 2009. It was so intense that I had what I will call almost wet dreams. Just nearly to that point.
So my clothing of choice was a black lightweight denim short-sleeved shorts playsuit (or romper or jumpsuit … whatever you want to call it) because (1) I love playsuits and (2) I thought it was appropriate since I wanted to have fun and “play”. Wore exact same playsuit as pic below (minus tights & not worn by moi in this pic).
2) Place small dots on the shiny side of the sticker paper (the side the stickers were stuck to before you peeled them off). Make all sizes (the large dot on my paper is the size of a quarter). Small dots, medium, tiny, have fun with it!! Having different size dots gives you more flexibility in use when you need them. The big dots can blob out as you see in the next pic.
Details: Here you will develop your main character. If there are several main characters, try to choose one. If you can’t decide, ask yourself: Which perspective will the comic follow? Which character is introduced first? If you insist that you have several main protagonists that cannot be classified as support, go ahead and create them during this phase too.
Another 106,743 voters were deleted and 6,762 added to the electoral roll without public display between the end of 2010 to the third quarter of 2011, he added.
When it comes to staff, if you are looking to take on employees then you will probably need office space. However, think about whether you could utilise freelance staff who could work from home themselves. Also, some people do have employees working from home, especially if there’s, say, a converted work space in the garden or garage. Still on the subject of other people, do you deal with clients? If you need somewhere to have meetings then an office could well be the answer, but remember there are cheaper alternatives such as hiring meeting rooms as and when you need them. If, however, you have daily client visits you would need a more permanent base from which to work.
Aren't they stunning? And soooo cheap.Sweet.
5.) The Kinks – Arthur / 1969
I can't find out much about the Twenty-Sixth Ward Bank of Brooklyn, except that is was founded in 1889, and in 1903 merged with State Mechanics' Bank of Brooklyn. That merger, in turn, was swallowed up by State Brooklyn Trust Company in 1929. On and on these mergers went, according to an account of New York bank history I found. The biggest and final fish was Chase.
He also loved power tools, and again, my protest and his lack of experience didn’t deter him from firing one up when I had my head turned—and sometimes when I didn’t. I was in awe that such a little kid had such big self-confidence. By the time he got old enough that he really could have been a help, he lost interest in coming over, and I felt very alone.
the earth is strong and present
Alicia Condon – She’s the newest editor at Kensington, though she’s worked at other houses. She edits romance and is heading up the new YA program at Kensington. What she’s looking for in romance – great opening hook, every scene moves the story forward and builds the tension, and the book has intense emotion and an unforgettable ending. She doesn’t care what subgenre is in if you can give her a great story. She’s interested in “any kind of romance – from inspirational to erotica.” She heads up the Brava line of erotic romance – she’d especially like to see a “hot, contemporary western romance” for Brava.
But I never want to be the man who has no heart,
The storms also were destructive in the Griffin/Barnesville area. One couple who attended the Griffin First Church of the Nazarene was killed and their family members were injured and hospitalized with some undergoing surgery Thursday morning. In Alabama, the 90,000-strong city of Tuscaloosa was hit hardest, with at least 37 people killed, including some students, authorities said.
I went to the British Book Awards that evening. After the award ceremony I bumped into a womanI hadn’t seen for nearly three years. The first thing she said to me? ‘You’ve lost a lot of weight since the last time I saw you!’
Dury, Ian (1981) ‘The Fifties: Razors out at rock riot’ Tony Stewart Cool cats. 25 years of rock'n'roll style London: Eel Pie.
Have a great week ahead!
When she was 15, Evelyn and her family moved to New York City. Jobs were shoved in her face. Everyone wanted a piece of her. She instantly became a famous fashion model. She became such a huge celebrity, her face actually inspired the iconic "Gibson Girl" illustrations. Young girls idolized her and powerful men wanted to meet her.
State police were called to the scene today for back up as Rutland delivered the news to Reed, but Reed left on his own accord.
jan..inskip derby arms half (pardon me?)
Cast : John Marley, Lynn Carlin, Richard Backus, Henderson Forsythe, Anya Ormsby, Jane Daly, Michael Mazes, Arthur Anderson, Arthur Bradley, David Gawlikowski, Virginia Cortez, Bud Hoey, Robert R. Cannon, Raymond Michel, Jeff Becker
a lifting of weight from my chest
Here I am we have raced once and have another tomorrow. Overall I am excited about where we are at and even with the challenge of loosing Duncan out of the boat for trials we have managed to work really well together with another athlete from the squad, Tom Swann. I guess this the ultimate test of our mens squad. Being able to get on with things and make all our boats as fast as we can.
His sensitivity reminds me of when I was little and had an irrational fear of spiders. I guess it started one night when I awoke to get a drink of water. When I climbed back into my bed and pulled the quilt back up to my chin, there was a huge wolf spider resting on my chest looking at me. (Can you imagine the 5-year-old girl kind of screaming?)
Soon the result would be repeated in other Israeli cities, NATO bases in Turkey, and at the tends of dozens of other US military bases that surround Iran. As each location was taken offline the destruction of their communication system prevented them from getting word to outside world about what was happening. At the same time the Iranian navy fired missiles from their warships located in the Mediterranean Sea at various strategic western assets.
I think this is another way to view the statment I was considering in a previous post: "There is nothing as whole as a broken heart."
Thawing your mind.
02. You Wreck Me
So for every vendor who replaces a light fixture, sprinkler controller, replaces a damaged stairway, deck railing… anything that an HOA is responsible for there should be photo documentation.
We celebrate Denim Day in honor of a woman who was forcibly raped by her driving instructor. The woman pressed charges, but the case was dismissed because the chief judge decided that, “…because the victim wore very, very tight jeans, she had to help him remove them, and by removing the jeans, it was no longer rape, but consensual sex.”
Story wise, very good. Morally, EXCELLENT.
And how does the next episode follow on from that?
That dependent doesn't mean non contributing.
flinked some
of our Muse’s savaged teat
Lord Jesus Christ, Son of God, deliver me from pride and give me self-knowledge.
with greening leaf and budding flower
Now I could continue, and then mention the lightning therapy, which apparently is based on the fact that ME patients are desperate to get well again and so they will try anything, even waiting for the god of lightning to strike, because apparently they can talk to our adrenal glands and tell them you should beheeve you little buggers and then suddenly, all is well.
Family: 4 children
We do not want to cause panic (though it’s sometimes tempting) so poor Lula stays home more often than not. It would not be responsible for me to suggest these are the perfect dogs for everyone; especially if considering a rescued animal that may have been abused. It is important to remember dogs are naturally pack animals, and when dealing with any larger breed owners need to train the dog well. If you do not assert yourself as the “alpha”, they will.
That’s not unusual in Kentucky. In some election years, the number of incumbent lawmakers without challengers is even higher. The reasons are varied, including the necessity for lawmakers living in distant parts of the state having to be away from home for about three months a year while the Legislature is in session.
Size Does Matter
I can remember back in high school when I would hate washing/wearing certain pairs. I would only wear my favorite on a “special day” because I didn’t want to waste the use. Why is that? (other than that I’m weird). I’m assuming I didn’t want them to fade…or shrink…or loosen…or get a worn look to them. Which brings me to another point..I feel like getting a new pair of jeans kind of symbolizes something new in your life. For example, why do we buy new pairs? Either we have gained or lost weight, worn them out, gotten a stain or rip on them, or we are just plain sick of that style. Isn’t that kind of synonymous to different events in our lives? Lets think about it, weight changes can be attributed to stresses and new environments (ex. starting college, or getting a new job). Wearing jeans out means you’ve worn them for soo long that you need a change (ie. done the same thing for so long, so you are ready for changes). Staining or ripping your jeans usually means that you were doing something out of the ordinary, or more risky than usual. Being sick of a certain style symbolizes that you are in an “out with the old, in with the new” kind of mood. Isn’t that weird?? Maybe we are buying jeans not just to buy a new pair, but because we feel that we are changing somehow?
-pockets & tights: olive green, 5767-T, 617-T
However, the diesel engine is not subject to this limitation. It runs at high compression ratio. In part, this explains its high efficiency. It also runs lean, and its pumping work is low, further increasing its efficiency over the gasoline engine. Humankind needs quiet, smoke-free, odor-free diesels! Apart from comression ratio Diesel engine also have all the other inefficiencies as petrol engine, like friction loss, reciprocal to rotary conversion loss etc. Also it is more polluting than petrol engine.
I haven't decided where it will land, but my options are in the Master Bedroom over the bed, in the Living Room over the couch, or in the front room that has no purpose at the moment. Where would this basket land in your home?
, and the prize is 5 digi images of the winner's choice, how cool is that! The Stamping Boutique have just introduced a one day per week where everything in the store is one buck, so check it out and get a bargain!
The book “In the Company of Men” by Nancy Mace gives you a terrific overview of knob year and the terms you’ll hear from your cadet.
Mrs. Obama pointed to her own girlhood up on Chicago's South Side, where her parents showed endless support for her.
A newer zombie film from the UK, "Devil’s Playground" apparently offers SUPER ATHLETIC FAST ZOMBIES. Which probably will just end up meaning a hybrid between two film fads from this movie's production year, zombies and parkour. In any case, let’s see if it can keep the interest of our resident zombie aficionados Starkwell and Lovelock.
It never did. He loved the scam.
The children found out why we wear a red poppy and when the first two minute silence happened in London? The First Two Minute Silence in London (11th November 1919)
Wrap each piece loosely in a piece of aluminum foil. Place the foil packets in a steamer and steam for 30 minutes. If you are making more than 4 packets, you might want to do this in batches so the steamer isn’t too crowded and each packet has room to expand. When the steaks cool, transfer them to the refrigerator for at least an hour but preferably, overnight in a container.
So any networking efforts should be targeted at building a list of “loyal” followers who get to know you, develop a fondness for you, and trust you because you’re an authority on something, or stand for something tangible as a personality.
And when I think of Superman, the phrase "Mom, the Flag & Apple Pie" comes to mind.
Veggie Tales Princess and the Pop Star is adorable. I knew it would be an instant hit with my 4yr old daughter, who is into all things princess and who loves music! We've seen many of the Veggie Tales shows and have always enjoy them. We can count on Veggie Tales to send good messages to our kids. There is never any concern about inappropriate language (that many kids shows freely use these days). The songs are catchy and are fun to sing along with.
1 knob of fresh ginger, finely chopped
Different factors are involved in aggravating a case of colic. A mother who is nursing should consider eliminating certain foods from her diet: spicy cuisine, citrus, peanuts, broccoli, cauliflower, cabbage, nightshades (tomatoes and peppers), corn, onions, garlic, soda and coffee, food dyes, and soy products. When I gave this list to Melissa, she asked me, "Maybe it would be easier if you just told me what I can eat." =D Yes, Mama will have to make some sacrifices but I think it would be worth it to have a peaceful, happy little darling. There are many other things to consider and various treatments that help. A wonderfully tried, true and thorough resource is this thread on WellTellMe.com (the link will direct you to a message summarizing the rather lengthy thread).
I'm still struggling to find a book that agrees with me. I'm persevering with Alan Warners "The Stars in the Bright Sky", but it's a struggle. I've had Jo Nesbo's Snowman sitting by the bed since the summer, but I've been saving it for desperate times. I think desperate times are upon us. The Mrs thinks I'm a nutter for saving up books like that, she just gets stuck in and devours 'em, straight away. I'm a bit fed up with the marketing of Nesbo. Having been reading him for a couple of years I don't want people thinking I've only picked him up because, apparently, he is the new Larsson. He is miles better than Larsson for a start.
These are my favorite flowers from childhood. My grandmother grew the sweet peas and bleeding hearts, and Mom always had hollyhocks up against the house. They grew other flowers, too, but none were as pretty to me as these three. I always promised myself that, should I ever actually have a garden, I would plant these three.
How have you heard God speak to you or seen him working in your life? For everyone, it’s different, and I love hearing stories, so please, share! God is so great!
Rodenbach Vintage '08
Author: John Green
Get your first sneak peek at the Official 2012 UEFA Euro 2012 Sticker & Album Collection below and pre-order your sticker and album collection now at iCollectPanini.com to ensure delivery at your doorstep before as it arrives in stores.
Let alone grant me Your grace?
1) ”It’s a tragedy our fellow man to give end to his life”
* set nautopush=32
On another note, today was the first and my renters who assured me they’d have the full rent plus any past due ($185) were not at the house when I stopped by to collect. I left a cancellation of the lease agreement on the door and will also mail them a copy. What are the odds I see any of that $750? I’d say, unlikely at best. Further, when I went over there, no one was around, but the front door was wide open. Now, I get to go over there daily and become a royal pain in the ass to them. Well, I won’t be a pain, but I will show up every day after radiation until I get an answer about payment. That’ll be fun for me.
Uttered from my heart, I realized that I believe in the church that I see every day as I go to work; in each moment that my young adult group and I conduct a service event or share our faith journeys. I see it in my friend’s new role as father, as he invites me to pray with his baby before putting him to bed, using words said for thousands of years, and ones we grew up professing together. I see it in my Father’s patient position as a caregiver, each day living out the Gospel message. I see it in my friend’s role as a loving, supportive wife. I believe in the goodness of our church, of the opportunity it has to become even more beautiful, diverse, holy, welcoming and honoring of all of God’s people.
but in my heart
Craig and Jason are currently the whole staff. If you stop in, one of them will pour you a beer (if you find yourself shaking the bartender's hand, that's Craig), and if you order a sandwich, one of them will scuttle over to the side of the bar and make it for you on the spot. And if they blow a keg--as they did last night with the stout--one of them will wheel around to the brewery, which encircles the pub in stainless steel, and whip up a new batch. As I was on my way out, Craig stopped to sniff the air. "Smell that?" he asked. "That's the stout Jason just started." It was eight-thirty at night.
Tickets for the Baltimore Beer Week Opening Tap event at the Baltimore Museum of Industry, 6-8 PM on Thursday, Oct 7th, will be on sale tomorrow at the BBW website. Tickets are $30 and only a limited number of tickets will be available--under 250, according to committee reports--making this almost a guaranteed sell-out.
I drank leftover coffee at 9:00 PM to help me stay awake. It paid off!
Is online piracy and the 'free culture' business model slowly destroying culture - or at the very least the culture industries? Make up your own mind, but Robert Levine's thoughts can be found in Free Ride available for £15.99 from www.guardian.co.uk/bookshop or call (UK) 0330 333 6846.
The Man Who Changed His Mind (aka "Body Switch", "Doctor Maniac", and "The Man Who Lived Again") (1936)
Book 2 - Catching Fire
Total time: about 1 hour
Joanne and I had often joked about writing our story and it was my husband, Jay, who laughingly suggested we do so. Saying he wanted us to write a best seller so he could retire and live on the beach! Well, Joanne and I wanted to live at the beach, too, so we began writing a little each day. My first drafts were terrible. My second drafts were, at times, even worse. Joanne’s writing clearly put mine to shame. Still, I persisted. I was hooked, and not about to quit just because my writing talents were limited.
Don’t forget! Sunday is Earth Day. Do something nice for Mother Earth! Go for a walk and pick up items for recycling or work in the yard……..enjoy the nature that surrounds you! Earth Day dates back to 1970 and has gained prominence in recent years with the discussion on global warming and such. As inhabitants of our beautiful planet, it is up to us to keep it clean and “green”. One way we can all do this is to recycle. In our city of Temple Terrace, there is a big recycling effort. If you are not already participating, all you have to do is call the city and they will deliver recycling bins to your home and you just fill them and put them out on your appointed day.
Hey! Who pushed me? What do you mean life takes no breaks for you? Its dark in here and I don’t know where to go. What the hell, I’ll just keep on fumbling. Mmm, so soft. Oh sorry, didn’t realise. I’ll stop now.
He makes her believe that she is so special
(Paulo Sergio Valle, Marcos Valle)
- I'm saying bye to all the amazing friends I made in my 1 year of uni
I commit myself to brining myself point where I stop trying to hold onto past patterns of self abuse while at the same time walking patterns of self support and self correction, I see that it is one or the other and to thus stop torturing myself by attempting to do both which only just create allot of friction.
A friend's comment has caused me to ponder the question "How will I stay organised once the baby comes along?" And I'm not sure that I can accurately answer that question other than to say to myself, "I probably won't". I have no idea how our lives will be turned upside down once "Peanut" (baby) has arrived, in the most unpredictable and joyful way.
from within.
I don't know, I have loved that word all my life. I have loved angel lore all my life. And everything else that goes with the word.
We had figured on our first hatch of the year being muscovy ducks. But the due date came and went. It is a bit tricky to decide when they start sitting, as they seem to sit some of the time for a while before getting on with it properly. But we are a week over now.. and doubtful of a happy outcome now. The problem is poor Chloe chose a really difficult time for her brood – she was laying the first of the eggs in the heat wave, and since then we have had all weathers thrown at us – and if the due date was right and it was last week, that was when the Westcountry had floods, the rain was a downpour, and maybe too much wet and cold got into the nest? We did some egg post mortems – two were bad, and one had a fully formed duckling. So.. we might have commited duckicide.. or it might have been doomed by the weather. We are giving her a few more days.
This allowed farmers to produce and buy more food, according to a news release issued by FAO, which as part of its emergency response, distributed seeds and fertilizers to Somali farmers. The agency also rehabilitated 594 kilometres of irrigation canals and treated 2.6 million livestock at risk of diseases and infections associated with drought.
Tokelo Nhlapo, a member of the Student Representative Council at the university and also a member of the ANC youth league sang the song while the group was waiting for Malema's arrival to deliver a speech on 'economic freedom'.
Of course, I didn’t eat the cheddar bagel first. That would be foolish of me. Instead I had the garbage bagel first. Covered with poppy seeds, roasted garlic, onion, y’know, all the good stuff, it was simply delicious. Then I pulled the cheddar bagel from the bag.
1 turnip (roughly chopped)
Here is Larry the guitar player's blog. He took the crowd photos from the stage. Shonna and I are on the right side of the Vancouver one, some of our peeps are in the Portland one, and all of us except Carolyn are in the Seattle one.
And if I have a heart attack there's another major price tag for a hospital stay. I pay buckets of money out my miserable salary for health insurance and what do I get? I'll tell ya what I get, I get iffy care from iffy nurses. The last hospital nurse I had on the 3rd shift had that glassy eyed high as a kite look. I was scared to death of her. I tell ya, I don't get any respect.
The last few years have been great, and I am looking forward to making the next few even greater. I hope to grow both as a person and as an artist. I always dream big, and so far, my life has supported that style of optimism. Once I get fully settled into this new chapter, I will return to this blog and start making a creative mess once again.
van twijfel en van angst – en
But the fact of the matter is that Maxi not being challenged meant he was board and that mean he didn't want to go to school, which in turn meant he and I wasn't happy. So I felt I had to take this in hand and deal with it and it that means Maxi being labeled as gifted and talented then so be it. I am concerned for the here and now, we can deal with next years education when it comes around. I need him to want to go to school now and moving him up a year is not the solution in my eyes. He is 5 years old, he has the social skills of a five year old and he needs to learn to deal with his talents and also with his peers to become part of their group.
I proceeded to dance my ass of right in front of her, so she couldn’t see herself in the mirror. That’s what happens when you fight with a big, tall girl who knows how to dance. You lose.
I think I may have to go and have a lie down.
Now you are starting to look like a real adult. You have a job, you have a home, you have stopped wearing the same ratty hoodie everyday. You are now set up for the rest of your life, experiencing the same day after day until you eventually die. There’s only one thing holding you back.
In 1415 Wycliffe was declared a heretic for his unlicensed translation of the Bible. His body was exhumed and burned to ashes.
He was a student of Master Kodo Sawaki, an itinerant priest famous for his efforts to restore Zazen to its rightful place at the center of Buddhism. Master Nishijima was ordained as a priest by the late Master Rempo Niwa, formerly head of the Soto Sect, and has written many books on Buddhism in both Japanese and in English. For over twenty years, he has been giving instructions on Zazen and lectures in English.
‘Roxy left me a message six months ago
"Yogurt!"
Although the race officially starts at 6:45 a.m., runners have to catch a bus, typically from downtown Monterey, Calif., to Big Sur. The bus ride takes more than an hour along the winding Pacific Coast Highway (the race course). Buses depart about 4 a.m., so you get to the start with a cup of coffee, a bottle of water, some food, and wild-eyed anxiousness to hit the pavement.
And what does he do about it, this modern white male of ours? While misogynistic black boys who preach the Gospel According to Snoop and can barely keep their own pants up are propped up by a zeitgeist that exalts willful ignorance and a twelfth-grader's idea of masculinity — what does he do about it? Jokers unable to compete in a society that prizes more than dick size suddenly become the aces of the deck as the Great American Value System stoops to mimic that of the ghetto — and what does Whitey do about it?
" We have been here an hour, and they just finished page one."
Oh, and I ran a marathon last weekend. It was fun and that's why I didn't get a post out.
Instead of showing you the raw Rydex Leveraged ETF ratio as before, I thought we’d instead look at the 100 day stochastic of the ratio. This simply takes the ratio and converts it into a range bound indicator with a maximum of 100 and a minimum of 0.
Chopper: I mean, what the bloody hell were you doing getting lippy at me with a bloody shotgun? I had a bloody loaded shotgun.
It asks a lot of questions about what it means to be an artist, when there is no audience or support from others.
Two weeks later I had a better idea what I was in for. The weather was also much nicer, and I was able to wear light outdoor clothing. Again I brought my book of verses, which would help guide my prayers. This time the traffic was heavier, and there was foot traffic. I almost felt like a homeless person, as most people did their best not to make eye contact. Thankfully the few that did gave me a smile of encouragement.
Matt: “Is it better to throw up on myself and the machine, or the huge muscled guy next to me?”
What are you saying to your children, your spouse, your co-workers? How are your words affecting them? Are they encouraging, lifting, comforting and affirming? Or, are your words cutting, insulting condescending, or demeaning? You are creating the atmosphere you live in by the words you speak…make sure it’s an environment that will empower and not dis-empower you to reach the goals you are pursuing! Talk is cheap; but the consequences are costly!
Back in the early '90s, when the bourbon renaissance was just in its embryonic stages, United Distillers & Vintners (the company that would later become Diageo) released the Bourbon Heritage Collection. The Heritage Collection was a series of five whiskeys from the company's US distilleries. These include whiskeys distilled at Stitzel-Weller and labels that no longer exist, so I was pretty happy to find an old set of miniatures (you know I love the minis) representing the entire collection.
So we got out the album and I showed him where it was in his backpack and he smiled at some of the pictures. Daddy put his favorite CD on in the car (Imagination Movers) and he apparently looked at those pictures all the way to school. They got to school and Zach cuddled with his teacher and showed her the pictures. He had a few rough spots this morning but had a perfect afternoon. He's been telling us for weeks that if Teagan isn't at school, he won't love anyone there. Today, he decided that he loves Ms. Cora.
This Next, and Last one is a bit more Meaningful to me… Matters of the Heart lead me to a lot of Evanescence Listening Last year… As was Evident, in the use of many of their songs along side some of my Poetry…
And I'll own-up to the fact that I arrived the tiniest bit unprepared. It was almost like not being prepared at all . . . lol. Having never been before, it seemed so pointless to set an agenda. How DOES one plot a course through 10 million square feet of showplaces? So . . . I did the thing I most often do when I'm traveling abroad. I made a few key appointments. Checked the friends to see what they might recommend. But, decided to let the lion's share of the weekend just happen organically.
I had to call my husband and .... reminded him the blind guy is coming so I can't pick the kids up. He says, "I know you probably told me this already, but who is the blind guy?" "The guy that is going to measure our windows." "How is he going to measure them if he is blind?" "No, he is not blind. He is measuring for our new blinds. He works for budget blinds."
First, we made the sauce, a mix of brown mustard, sour cream, mayo, tarragon and garlic, which was simply amazing. It’s the kind of sauce you'll happily smother over even the tenderest, most expensive fillet mignon. And thankfully, it's also the kind of sauce that'll salvage an over-cooked piece of ordinary meat.
Why so? “For Him whom Thou hast smitten they have themselves persecuted, and upon the pain of my wounds they have added” (ver. 27). How then have they sinned if they have persecuted one by God smitten? What sin is ascribed to their mind? Malice. For the thing was done in Christ which was to be. To suffer indeed He had come, and He punished him through whom He suffered. For Judas the traitor was punished, and Christ was crucified: but us He redeemed by His blood, and He punished him in the matter of his price. For he threw down the price of silver, for which by him the Lord had been sold; and he knew not the price wherewith he had himself by the Lord been redeemed. This thing was done in the case of Judas. But when we see that there is a sort of measure of requital in all men, and that not any one can be suffered to rage more than he hath received power to do: how have they “added,” or what is that smiting of the Lord? Without doubt He is speaking in the person of him from whom He had received a body, from whom He had taken unto Him flesh, that is in the person of mankind, of Adam himself who was smitten with the first death because of his sin. Mortal therefore here are men born, as born with their punishment: to this punishment they add, whosoever do persecute men. For now here man would not have had to die, unless God had smitten him. Why then dost thou, O man, rage more than this? Is it little for a man that some time he is to die? Each one of us therefore beareth his punishment: to this punishment they would add that persecute us. This punishment is the smiting of the Lord. For the Lord smote man with the sentence: “What day ye shall have touched it,” He saith, “with death ye shall die.” Out of this death He had taken upon Him flesh, and our old man hath been crucified together with Him. By the voice of that man He hath said these words, “Him whom Thou hast smitten they have themselves persecuted, and upon the pain of My wounds they have added.” Upon what pain of wounds? Upon the pain of sins they have themselves added. For sins He hath called His wounds. But do not look to the Head, consider the Body; according to the voice whereof hath been said by the Same in that Psalm, wherein He showed there was His voice, because in the first verse thereof He cried from the Cross, “God, My God, look upon Me, why hast Thou forsaken Me?” There in continuation He saith, “Afar from My safety are the words of Mine offences.”…
By then his lip had started to quiver. I paid him for the wood and wished him well.
Anyhow.My first act today is to create a World-Wide population explosion!
The Power of Home Instead’s Life Journal™
singing wistfully to the tune of Moon River:
“I’ll have your know,” David said enraged, “that the Second American Republic is the greatest and freest country God ever saw fit to grace this planet and free market capitalism made it that way. Your words mean nothing to me.”
They offer vegetarian, vegan and gluten-free options in their menu, which makes them all-around accessible to everyone's food needs and tastes.
What’s more, unless you work in a bubble, it’s inevitable that you’re going to be around people who predispose you to illness at your place of employment—for example, that hacking and coughing officemate who should have stayed home—but sticking to office hygiene as well as general hygiene, getting plenty of sleep and eating right will help to keep you healthy.
And we will all the pleasures prove,
Mike is also husband to the lovely and talented Paulette and Dad to my pals, Eva and Ella.
Mix 1 teaspoon grated lemon zest with 3 tablespoons sugar; toss about a third of the lemon-sugar with 3 cups halved strawberries. Make the egg mixture for Perfect French Toast (see below); add 4 split English muffins and soak, 5 minutes, then fry and bake as directed. Sandwich some strawberries and more lemon-sugar between the muffin halves. Top with yogurt, more berries and a drizzle of honey.
Many people do not know that interior design does not deal purely with design factors but that interior designers need to possess good organizational skills. The Interior designer is like a project manager as he or she will work closely with architects and clients to determine the structure of a space, the needs of the occupants, and the style that best suits both. There is an emphasis on planning, functional design, and effective use of space.
Snake symbolic meaning, overwhelmingly and in various cultures, deals with primordial life force and usually turns our attention to gender supremacy (both male and female).
David (6 years 5 months): Finishing up at dinner in a Davenport friend’s home, David whispered to his mom, “The cheesecake tastes like Styrofoam.” (#63)
Miss Anderson had never encountered such ambitious seven year-olds.
I will say it many times, it is ALWAYS best to settle and filter your water first. Pathogens can hide in and on suspended particles and be shielded from the disinfectant. It is like a little bacteria bunker, and they are waiting till the coast is clear to emerge again. Except this time it will be inside you. Another reason to filter first is that the dirtier the water the higher the disinfectant demand and more disinfectant will be needed to do the same thing. This will be very important for two reasons. First, your supplies will be depleted significantly sooner. I have seen the disinfectant demand go up over seven times normal levels when there is a small increase in turbidity (cloudiness due to suspended particles). The disinfectant demand is one of the critical monitoring points at my water treatment plant (and most others) not just because the water needs to be disinfected before it can be delivered to the customer, but it lets me know that something is not working properly in my facility.
kenfrost.com.cn
Post lunch, we crossed the street to Cupcake – a well-known bakery in town. Somehow these sweets made it all the way back the Mitten with us. I know, so out of character!
In 1963, Poitier became the first black person to win an Academy Award for Best Actor for his role in Lilies of the Field. The significance of this achievement was later bolstered in 1967 when he starred in three well-received films—To Sir, with Love; In the Heat of the Night; and Guess Who’s Coming to Dinner—making him the top box office star of that year. In 1999, the American Film Institute named Poitier among the Greatest Male Stars of All Time, ranking 22nd on the list of 25.
Keep your eyes on the forums and ask questions. People are very helpful over at the official Bethesda forum and there’s a lot of knowledge to be gained from there. Good luck!
# 1 The seventh day of creation and the weekly Sabbath commemorating it (Genesis 2:2; Hebrews 4:4-9)
LibertySparkler
They're not the innocent swaddling-clad bands of people you see selflessly returning lost rings for a small thank you fee. You've been had, my friends.
Spellbinders dies
See you next week, hopefully with some creative takes on these items.....
Where would you set the boundaries for teen fiction?
I’m crying but not feeling upset and laughing when i feel like crying
Louisiana leads the nation in incarceration rates, with 881/100,000 residents in jail. Mississippi is number two, with 502/100,000 residents in jail. That’s quite a distance from us!
Ah it has been a good week for shopping.
9.Last Love
Preheated oven to 400 degrees.
In Little Match Girl, Meow Meow again moves her prodigious abilities onto a larger stage, collaborating with musical director Iain Grandage to create an intoxicating mixture of music and Meow Meowness, under the sharp direction of Marion Potts. Here the conceit is Hans Christian Andersen's story, in which a starving, abused girl is staring into the windows of the rich on Christmas Eve, as she freezes to death outside.
“I wish I could make you see how much fuller the life I offer you is than anything you have a conception of. I wish I could make you see how exciting the life of the spirit is and how rich in experience. It’s illimitable. It’s such a happy life. There’s only one thing like it, when you’re up in a plane by yourself, high, high, and only infinity surrounds you. You’re intoxicated by the boundless space.”
John: I believe.
I surrender
Does not always stay in Vegas, especially when you are Mormon and do not do the typical craziness that Sin City offers. We had a fantastic time, reconnected, ditched the kids, ate amazing food, played the slots, ran from the weirdos on the Strip, celebrated my 34th birthday, watched some great street performers, and even took a nap!!! Does not get better than that!
Tine :)
Mercy goes home with a
I read these stories from gay girls around the planet and hear how they suffer and experience all that outcast misery… And I never felt any of that, even when what I experienced matches what they experienced. Is it a different outlook? Am I somehow more emotionally stable? Was I just in a better environment or headspace?
here I go with my final "Nature Notes" post. To be honest I've not been feeling the love for this post . I think my own pictures are not so good as other months ,but I guess December is not always very photogenic. How different it was last year.
Immigrants to the New World brought along their beliefs and customs, the Dutch settlers bringing Sinter Klaas – later to become the modern American Santa Claus.
It is amusing to watch how we humans adapt. I have been through many changes in my life and today I am so aware of the process, paying so much more attention to it, then I ever did before. We are all creatures of habit and thus I too am slowly adapting certain habits and routines in my new home, as I have done in some many homes before. There is a difference this time around as I have never before lived with children.
So a small suggestion. A tiny request. Didn’t mean to cause a riot. Well, maybe not exactly an Occupy Wall Street mob, but, at least, a tumultuous uproar.
Mostly from stuff at work.
“Is it you?” I asked, though it wasn’t really a question. Aside from the hair and wardrobe befitting a Northern California techie, he looked exactly as he had at 15: tall and handsome, with penetrating, intelligent eyes.
I think its because you make me nervous. You are like a proper writer, with a FAN BASE. I feel a bit insipid and main stream beside you. If I was a man I would probably fight you. Because I am a girl I giggle.
771 D-XI/12/1978. “On Obscenity.” With Larry Parrish. Fred Cook Program, WPTV-TV, Memphis, Tennessee.
The child’s name is on the cake.
before summer begins.
Okay. I might have made that last part up.
I had done so much work to get everything into the living room that I told Lynnette she could let Abby out to sleep with us. It would have worked, too, except Abby had no interest in sleeping. She ran around the area, liked Madison while she slept, scratched at one of the blankets, and worst of all, jumped onto my crotch in the darkness, eliciting a swear word at 11:30 at night. Somebody else in the living room giggled. Lynnette put Abby back but she wouldn’t stop barking. We gathered our things and headed back to the room. Abby stopped barking immediately. So much for our camping trip.
After allowing for plenty of drying time, it was time to put the closet (and surrounding room) back together again. Shelves, hooks, and fresh paint really make the closet look like a more cohesive part of the room.
Doesn’t force itself on others,
Stephen Laws – Guilty Party
I think GOLDENEYE would have worked better if the producers built around the 006/007 conflict a bit more, but it pulls the 006 is Dead!-Gotcha!-006 is the Real Bad Buy! card instead. Bean and Brosnan make good enemies and when they’re on screen together GOLDENEYE works better than when they’re not, but the film never really develops Alec’s character, preferring to turn him into the kind of villain that forces himself on a woman because he’s mad that she’s Bond’s girl.
university newsroom, big glasses and frilly blouse. Hair that smelled like the
Genevieve is back with another guest post! (To read her other posts, simply click on the tag ‘Genevieve’s Guest Posts’ at the top of this entry.)
May 1 2004, EU Enlargement day, was the watershed. . Most existing EU countries imposed temporary restrictions (for up to seven years) on the entry of workers from the ten new member states. Ireland did not. Perhaps the government, flush with economic success and aware of labour shortages, applied the argument that any restrictions had a sell-by date and were not worth the candle. The government however can hardly have anticipated the extent of the influx which followed.
Zenick H, Blackburn H, Hope E, Richdale N, Smith MK. Effects of trichloroethylene exposure on male reproductive function in rats. Toxicology 1984; 31: 237-250.
You are an adept problem solver. You are always tossing around dozens of ideas.
Clinton told CNN?
With Digi Darla challenges you MUST use a Digi Darla image. Don't have one? Be sure to check out the freebies found on the sidebar of the challenge page.
Yours always (but not exclusively),
We had a blast! We drove together -- munching on unhealthy (and some not so unhealth) food, talking sports, listening to music, and generally teasing Patrick and his son Sam the whole way to Genoa. Once the match started we sat back and enjoyed a little bit of history. We watched as the United States defeated Italy for the first time...ever. A nice second-half goal by Clint Dempsey was the winner. The stadium in Genoa is called Stadio Luigi Ferraris and it was first opened in 1911. And while the seats were a bit small and there was absolutely no leg room, every seat was great (including ours) and the atmosphere was terrific.
begins to whir. . .
MAHB had last month received the Transport Ministry’s nod to raise airport tax at the country’s 39 airports it manages, excluding low-cost carrier terminals (LCCTs), to RM65 from RM51 for international travellers. For departing international passengers at the LCCT in Sepang and Terminal 2 Kota Kinabalu, the airport tax will be raised to RM32 from RM25.
but, i actually use paste.
We need to recruit new compassionate doctors and medical professionals who will abide by and honour the long held safeguard to ensure fair and equal treatment to all of the sick without prejudice - The Hippocratic Oath.
Let’s have one good meal here. Let’s make it a feast. Then I ask you, I plead with you, I beg you all, walk out of here with me, never to come back. It’s the moral and ethical thing to do. Nothing good goes on in this place. Let’s lock the doors and leave the building to the spiders, moths and four-legged rats.
Chairman, Inter Faith Relations Committee, MCB
Folding: Regular
THE PRESIDENT: I have spoken extensively to business leaders. And I’ll be honest with you. I think that business leaders in the abstract want to see a resolution to this problem. What I’ve found is that they are somewhat hesitant to weigh in on some of these issues even if they’re willing to say something privately to me, partly because they’ve got a whole bunch of business pending before Congress and they don’t want to make anybody mad.
So, Best Buy just lost a $2500 sale and we are now going to HH Gregg.
The contrary argument is that these are not “benefits” of the sort contemplated by the case law on Constitution s 51(xxxi) but rather the specific incidents of general regulation in the public interest that the case law is careful to distinguish from a “corresponding benefit”. The sorts of benefits the High Court (with the possible exceptions of Deane and Gaudron JJ) sees as “corresponding benefits” are quantifiable for a start e.g. there is an obvious actual or potential dollar value to the Commonwealth extinguishing a debt (Mutual Pools), cause of action in tort (Georgiadis, Mewett) or a mining lease (Newcrest). Moreover, if it were accepted that the sort of diffuse general public benefits described in the BATA submissions satisfied the High Court’s requirement for a “corresponding benefit” flowing from an extinguishment of property rights, then the Australian approach to Constitution s 51(xxxi) would be essentially indistinguishable from the US Supreme Court’s approach to the “takings clause”. Almost by definition any legislation involves a putative public benefit and could potentially be described in terms not dissimilar to those in BATA’s submissions. It is unlikely that the High Court would countenance such an approach.
She married a man from home whose German his family name meant “Grief.” I have a photo of him, with other men, hard and earnest in their aprons and caps, standing on the steps of the Cleveland steel works. He got slivers of metal in his hands; every night my mother picked them out. He could fight in German, Polish, Russian, but English always slipped away.
General Things About Mantle Cell Lymphoma
Busy weekend. Back to the grind today...How was your weekend?
“Blessed are the people who know the joyful sound! They walk, O Lord, in the light of Your countenance. In Your name they rejoice all day long, And in Your righteousness they are exalted.”
6823 Cypresswood Drive
Lukas Liquor at 13657 Washington, KCMO
In any case, the assumption in Ankron and De Aldecoa was not absolute. Land classification was, in the end, dependent on proof. If there was proof that the land was better suited for non-agricultural uses, the courts could adjudge it as a mineral or timber land despite the presumption. In Ankron, this Court stated:
I’ve said before that college wasn’t worth the money I crapped away on it. Half the people I know who went to college right after high school had no clue what they even wanted to study let alone what career path they wanted to take. So, in the Holy Name Of Being a Well Rounded Student, they spend their first couple years at a cost of several thousand dollars, pissing about exploring majors and taking “required core classes” like Sociology 101 and Psych 101, receiving touchy-feely politically-correct left-wing indoctrination until they figure out what they THINK they wanna do with their lives. A vast preponderance of the people I know with degrees don’t work in the field they studied in.
That furthest right group of voters has never been all that friendly to Romney though. What has to be a greater sign of concern for him is that with those labeling themselves as only 'somewhat conservative' he still trails Perry 37-19 with Bachmann at 11% and Cain at 10%. When Romney's primary threat was Bachmann he was still winning this group of voters. But Perry seems to be filling a void for voters looking for someone more conservative than Romney and more credible than Bachmann and if he can sustain his lead with that segment of voters he's going to be tough to topple.
The only reason that I would not want to hike the Grand Canyon Rim to Rim in one day is because I know that if I ever hike the Chilkoot again I will actually extend the trip by 5 days… I would not want to rush through that beauty.
When Spitzer resigned in the wake of a prostitution scandal, Paterson was sworn in as governor of New York on March 17, 2008. Paterson launched a brief campaign for a full term as Governor in the 2010 gubernatorial election, but announced on February 26, 2010, that he would not be a candidate in the Democratic primary.
Some things to consider though. I am interested in pretty much every aspect of the hobby, so I follow Warhammer 40K, old school wargaming, naval, any scale imaginable, scenery, pulp, and any other kind of wargaming blog you can think of. Also, keep your Blogs of War subscription. Just today a new blog was added, with a new entry, so you can add more to your own subs.
My beauty.
Michigan’s unemployment rate, consistently higher than the national average, soared above 15 percent between 2009 and 2010. No state, not even Katrina-stricken Louisiana, had seen this kind of unemployment in 25 years.
Michael Porter, the Harvard business school guru, defined how industries work in his book on competitive strategy. He drew out the relationships between competitive enterprises and their supply chains, infrastructure, distribution channels, and advocacy organizations. He noted how industries develop secondary support firms - such as specialized consulting services geared toward the needs of the enterprises in that industry.
Even though the Go Between has been up for about 2 years, I've never walked or run across it. Today was the day. It only adds about 500m to the length of the run, but I figure now I've done this I can run more along the other side of the river.
5. When a Man Needs a Woman
Alrighty, who has gotten the new Cricut Expression 2 yet??? I just got mine 2 days ago, and finally took it for a spin today. Well, I must confess that first I got my super smart hubby to do the update for me, and THEN I dove in. I actually read through the entire user manual, while trying out each function. Yes, I'm a nerd. But I feel pretty comfortable with it now, and really love it. So today I decided that I'd like to make a project using only the E2 and the carts that are pre-loaded into it. Here it is. See below for sizing details...
He would delight in making ironic use of the jargon of advertising and PR, and mocking the construction (and indeed constriction) of the human being as primarily a consumer and of the measurement of human progress primarily by economic indicators. And he would love to stand on the elevators of the Tube stations of London, looking at the vast array of human types from all around the world before him and listening to the sounds and stresses of their English and thinking of the images and transcriptions that would make them live again in his work.
The earlier we start thinking practically about these things, the more time we will have to prepare for the military challenges posed by the imperialists, whether from China or the U.S., maybe even Germany as they were used in the last two centuries to suppress popular unrest. This is an appeal to the youth, if you want real change, do not fear giving up your current morality, the only way change can truly come is if you are willing to change yourselves and sacrifice what you deem to be sacred, for the cause of permanent freedom, economic justice, and the true brotherhood of man. Let’s use this opportunity to deliver the final nail in the coffin of capitalism, you see the fear in the eyes of Prime Minister David Cameron, he knows that this is it for his vision of England. If England falls, the western world will follow.
Earlier in the month a Trenton woman had charges levied against her for abusing a kitten.
Legitimate inquiries earlier by The Sunday Times, a sister paper of The Sun, have already revealed dodgy dealings involving FIFA members, for which two were suspended.
where she was touched with sparks and
Christ came to unite himself to mankind and to unite humanity to Himself. He wished to give us his “divine power in all things that pertain unto life…” so that we might be “partakers of the Divine Nature” (2 Peter 1.3-4) which is thus called theosis (union with God, from Gr. Theos, God, and enosis, union–referring also to John 17 “I in them and Thou in Me, that they all may be one in us”) the final goal and greatest part of man’s salvation. He established a way by which all men could be united to Him and to each other in body and soul–Holy Communion (the body and blood of Christ), which when men partake of it in Faith, receiving Christ in their body and soul with Faith and love.
Sorry about that. Trust me when I tell you it actually looked WORSE in person. And in addition to its non-beauty, the meat smelled great while it was braising but when I warmed it up using a little veal stock, it made it smell like really bad b.o., which, you know, is great at meal time.
But needless to say around 1:30pm the power came back on and EVERYONE was Happy! After eating the ladies cleaned the Kitchen and the men were back off to their Basketball Games. We then played a few games of Taboo (My team won all 3 games whoot whoot!) we then started to prepare for bed and I finally got to lay back down around 1130pm.
Oil spills seem to unfortunately be a fact of life when drilling and transporting oil from the ocean floor. Massive spills, like BP’s disastrous four-million barrel belch in the Gulf of Mexico last year, though, are totally unacceptable. But the leaking of a few hundred barrels of oil per year seems to be par for the course when extracting millions.
Now let's talk lyrics for a second, shall we? Amy Lee is married, rich, and famous. Just how tortured can she really be? I mean, I know that celebrities can have problems but the angst in these lyrics seems rather manufactured to me. As my wife mocked, "My heart is broken... from being so rich and famous!" At one point Amy Lee sings, "I now know what it's like to be lost" or something like that. Really? It just feels fake to me, especially hearing about how recording this album was so much fun for her. I would rather she just write happy lyrics. That's okay, y'know!
Actually, Tuesday night was our monthly running club meeting where we had the executive director and the racing coordinator for the Chicago Area Runners Association come speak to us about some of their new initiatives and to get feedback on what we though they could be doing better. If you're a Chicago area runner and you don't belong to CARA you should know that they do more then get you race discounts and race training! They also have partnerships with businesses to get CARA members discounts on running apparel, gym memberships, and other running-related goodies. They also keep a database of volunteer opportunities so if you want to volunteer for a race in the Chicago area you can contact them and they'll let you know when they need volunteers.
FA: Yes, that’s a good point. After the first couple of laps with the intermediates, we didn’t need to use the hard tyres any more so we chose to do the whole dry race with the best performing tyre, which was the soft on this occasion, so there’s a question mark how the car would have performed with the hard tyre. In FP3 and Q1, we were very, very competitive with the hard, so we approached the race with no problems and no doubts as we had in Barcelona. There was a big problem but here we were convinced that we were OK with hard tyres but obviously it was just a thought. And without Hamilton keeping Sebastian behind, obviously the race was a little bit different, for sure. We had to push more to open the gap. With Lewis there, the race was a little bit more comfortable for us and we could drop the revs a little bit and take a bit more care of the engine, the tyres and things like that.
Squads block LOS to other squads (as in the normal rules). Consider the space between models of a single squad as a solid screen. For robots, consider their bases as blocking LOS.
My own daughter, 14 years old. I suggested maybe going every other year makes more sense. Would give her more time to save. Would give her more freedom. She said she was going, would raise the money. (and she almost has!) She tried out for color guard at school but told them she would not be on the team if it meant giving up church activities or her China trip. How many 14 year old girls are willing to do that?
I'll excuse the "random" posts lately, but my spring break is over and the papers that I need to do are piling up. But I still hope you enjoyed this weird-ish post. And tell me, which period of time would you go back to if you had a timemachine?
We stayed at The Old Priory, a big old convent converted into a guest house, which was a spit from the main street of town and a long arduous walk of all of 4 mins to the Bridge Road Brewery located on the main strip. You can guess that GB and I spent many an hour over the 3 days at this place. Bunkered down to try the many beers on tap and one or two of the lovely pizzas.
For fucks sake.
A very special blogger posted today about God's faithfulness, it was His words through her, I was so encouraged...and I could see His face!
I have made 19 hats and 14 scarves, along with 3 pair of mittens from this yarn so far. (The low mitten total was because I needed to get some new needles. I had warn down my wooden double points that I had been using.
Going back to Umber. A lot of that stuff kind of predated, I'm not even sure if you'd call it post-rock, really, because it really wasn't, and that's such a retarded term, anyway. Things like "Americruiser" or "Douglas Leader", those tracks stand out from that record. Do you think they still stand out?
Over time, Discovered Authors - but in particular BookForce - has got things badly wrong. It should not be forgotten that the company has also got a lot right. Running any business that combines various forms of publishing options is a tough one to pull off; few companies are deft and equipped enough to run a print and distribution service, as well as operate and market four publishing imprints. You will recall earlier in this review I cited a newsletter from former BookForce client, Kima Global. It was interesting to discover Kima Global switched to Lightning Source’s print and fulfilment services. What it does reveal is the level BookForce were trying to aspire to—real dream stuff. I admire the ambition, but reality can deliver some powerful kicks to your nuts.
Such is the tone of this Financial Times article, School For Quants. These UCL kiddies are working on the economic and social Frankenstein monsters of the future - computational economics and politics: algorithmic trading, and soon, algorithmic trending, in the form of SocialSTREAM and other large scale cultural analysis engines.
secret. It was something more. Keeping his body tight and distant. He did make
A personal bodyguard to the candid and sincere. I like that part, a lot.
I love to eat. I've never ever hidden that fact. My husband often will point out that I occasionally eat more than him. Can't help it...when mama finds something good, mama wants to eat it all up!!
Jesse: (Pointing at himself.) I think I’m one of those guys.
Different ways of cooking fish exist in different parts.
So, I offered my friend the ring, told her she could put it on a chain and maybe that would keep some of the pigs at bay, give her a little peace. She laughed and said, "No."
I guess that is all my news for now. I hope everyone is having a wonderful hump day.
“One year down the line, if you want to have a debate whether she looks the way she used to, then that’s fine.”
Lastly - I'm getting the opportunity to live for two years in a country that's completely foreign (pun intended) to most Americans, a place where very few people ever get to visit. And it's a proving to be a fascinating two years!
Okay, I will be serious now, at least a little. I like the first movie. It’s not blowing me away, but it works most of the time. It begins with introducing you to the wonder child, Tony Stark, who can build anything at a young age and grows up to take over his father’s multi international cooperation, the Stark Industries, for which he is designing weapons with great success.
Aww.
There are about a gazillion factors that goes through my head when I think about the issues of starting a family in Singapore – and guess what people? Money is just one of them.
(SB 5.12.14 Purport)
And why the man in my bed didn't make me feel any better
One way that I practice drawing is by forcing myself to draw random things. I’ll jot down a list of things to draw on my whiteboard and slowly check them off as I get them done whenever I have time.
The worst part about the holidays is trying to buy a gift for that special person in your life, and you just can't figure out what to buy.
“This is evident in our continuing initiatives to align ourselves with the paramount objective of creating a stable, peaceful and prosperous Asean community by 2020.”
I know this was a gift, some years ago – but to my shame, I cannot remember who gave it to me. I have washed off the dust, and now I shall find somewhere to display it – and possibly a bud or two to go in it.
Do you think its all going to happen before bed time tonight?
Nanti jer la I blog panjang panjang ;)
Labor Signs: nope
In the end, and adding some one to video you, this could turn in to a cool little promotional thing that could garner some radio and TV news attention. Give it a shot.
I knew what it was because I had found some mastic nuggets in a shop on the island of Kalymnos the previous summer while researching my 9th Roman Mystery, The Colossus of Rhodes. (see picture above)
I’m the black veiled pride. I’m lost, confused and blind. Disdainful to all that is delightful, I’m the black widow bride. I’m the enemy of all sweet life. I’m the daughter of Hades on earth, I’m a living breathing curse.
It was super yummy. In fact I liked it so much I made the next day for dinner too :) I am in love with my new baking dishes!
21. She's Up To Something New
100 Years--Dr. Dog
We’re supposed to believe that the father would wait three weeks to look over those records, and the lawyer wouldn’t have said anything about them?
Choices are the hinges of destiny.
Another blogger/soon-to-be author posted a one star rating of CassaStar on Goodreads this past weekend. At first it bothered me, and then I remembered the movie Good Will Hunting. There’s a scene where Matt Damon’s character says something awful about Robin Williams’ deceased wife, and the next time they meet, Williams tells him that at first it bothered him – and then he though, “He’s just a stupid kid.” And that’s how you should view reviews like that, because one star with no explanation is meaningless. Maybe that person didn’t like your book. Or maybe he just doesn’t like you or anyone else. Or maybe he gives out one star reviews to almost everyone. Regardless, it’s not worth stressing over.
I have a documented learning dissability that I move in and out of acceptance with. My willingness to embrace this is profound. I spent most of my extracariccular time from youth thru college in special ed or with tutors to develop coping skills and tools to task manage my dissability. For some reason as of late, in my most sincere truth I am reunited with the uncomforatble feeling of low self esteem as it relates to this dissability. It’s unfortunate that I am still attactched the results of my efforts and not just working for works sake.
I look her over
Former Marine Staff Sergeant and CIA handler David Corso of Pahrump, Nevada, commented, “What that sexy jarhead needs is to get into a mini-skirt, man-y-hose and high heels and get in touch with the real marine inside him — like I did!”
the television was off.
1. The Caked on Mascara Look - I love me some mascara too…to accentuate and lengthen and give your eyes a pop. But when you’re spending a good 10 minutes coating and re-coating you clearly have issues. Just stop after two coats. Stop. Put down the mascara and walk away. Away damn it!
Respect the property of others – ‘if your bum is bare cover the chair’
Affords coverage for losses to your insured vehicle other than as a result of a collision (i.e. fire, theft, vandalism etc.). The coverage amount may be the actual cash value of your vehicle and a deductible will usually apply.
No. 6
Empty
We need co-workers!
Man, did it make me happy.
That was the thought process that lead me to ask: What are some of your really dumb ideas... or good ideas that went south like a beach bum looking for the sun?
Within a couple of hours of writing the post about Doug hauling ass, prison-break style, he was back at home snoozing with a full belly. He'd been spotted in some bushes in front of a house on the street behind us. When he saw us, he skeedaddled into a back yard and got tormented by some bluejays and mockingbirds for a while. Then, once it started steadily drizzling, he decided to scale the fence and come home, meyowling the whole time. Sigh. I'm glad he's back, but we're definitely going to have to take steps to make him an indoor/outdoor creature or we're all going to go insane.
By then, it was just a matter of time before it's final demise.
"Movie stars have known this for decades. Looking good isn't just about the body or face you have; it's all about presentation. The setting, the pose, but most importantly, it's all about the lighting."
the corner that also leads to the back yard and our wood pile
Bracelets: Old Navy
Each year, Bruegger’s offers membership in its Bottomless Mug Club – for just $139 (depending on location) members receive a Travel Mug, wallet card or keytag and receive free, limitless refills of coffee, tea or soft drinks throughout the following year.
After that there was another photoshoot we decided to head back. Personally I’ve had some stomach problems so I didn’t feel very well. I think Girish was suffering from the same problem. I don’t know about Igor though. But the three of us headed back. From the rest V and Gaelle stayed to just meditate. The others decided to scale one more peak or at least a valley above a waterfall. On the way back the grassy meadow presented a nice stage for photos. There was no rush to go back – it wasn’t raining yet and we didn’t have a schedule to keep.
Lady Christina Fairhaven is an adoptive daughter but has considered her family to be her true family. Christina goes on with life as she finds out that her beloved brother has been killed and now is getting blackmailing letters saying he is a life and did something wrong. But life gets even stranger for Christina when she has a captain coming to her door claiming she is an heiress to a Duke, her grandfather.
"Well," she asks, "can you give me a definition or example of one?"
It feels good, though, fumbling toward figuring it out. I started walking Tucker to school in the last few weeks, which has been good in every single way. It's a little over a mile away, which is totally doable for Tucker and it gives me nearly 2.5 miles to get a little workout on. I am convinced I have to get in shape.... I am so very weak. To the point that it's hard to be a mother and lift and swing and hold.
I admit this’ll look like something I’ve made up – or borrowed from Oliver Sacks – but the only changes I’ve set out to make are to de-identify the patient involved. Yes, it goes back to my medical days, to 1988, when I was a junior doctor at a Brisbane hospital.
Is the world, ready, I wonder, for the return of Cupid Stunt, Sid Snot, Gizzard Puke, Marcel Wave, Captain Kremmen and the rest of "Cuddly Ken"'s characters to our screens? Not to mention thje chesty Cleo Rocas and the scandalous gyrations of Hot Gossip?
LIBRARIES MATTER. HELPING TO STOP LIBRARY CLOSURES MATTERS. As for Mr Spock with a goatee beard? That has something to do with ANTIMATTER, but there's no room for that here. We all have to act NOW before it's too late, so what are you waiting for? He also posted this on Facebook and got amazing commentsHere's Nick Cross from Who Ate My Brain, who despite admitting that he doesn't get to his library much, says:
Friends and foes in force do fly and face the fierce retort
It does make me wonder how her husband, Pascal Rubinat, deals with her receiving all this attention? She says he “takes great pride in hearing other men declare that I’m a beautiful woman” it’s important to note that SHE has spoken for him, which may (or may not) suggest that he might have a different view about it. I think that in the REAL world, the man might just start to get a little bit pissed off after a while, but that’s just what I think.
she looked back at me. and when her eyes softened, when the edges of her mouth began to form the tiniest trace of a frown, when i could see the sympathy in her shoulders – that’s when i realized what it was.
Once again I have left it so long to write up a report that my memory of the discussion is unlikely to be comprehensive, but here goes.
But lets stick to what’s really important here : the flute. Although many bands followed their example afterwards and started taking this sheep-controlling instrument more seriously , I still can’t get past the oddity of a rock band using it. Anyway, he mastered it. He’s the shaman, the priest, the warlock, the God of Flute. Pan would throw away his pipes and take flute lessons after seeing Ian performing.
Some of my best friends are black. I grew up around black people. I’ve lived in diverse communities, and had co-workers and business partners who are minorities. I’ve got black people in my family, and I’d like to think that I treat black people the way I would want to be treated. Some people even call me black (which I take as a compliment). I love black people, and not in the sarcastic way that comic Don Rickles would say while rolling his eyes.
And we already have our 2013 trip semi-worked out! We're heading West!!!! Yep! DISNEYLAND!!!! And most importantly, the new Carsland!! I was at Disneyland when I was a kid when my mom and step dad lived in San Fransisco. I am so eager to get back..and see the place as an adult and appreciate the park Walt created and was there to see finished. The plan is 5 days at Disneyland and then another 5 touring So Cal! :) Doing it in August, so I hope that will be a good time to visit! :) It will be way pricier than we're used to paying for...but hopefully we can swing it!
03 My Life
Verla Adaline Kley (1919-1989), daughter of Lewis and Mary Kley.
I write, and I write, and I write. And the more I write in the first person, the more uncomfortable I feel. I don't like feeling like I'm projecting my personal thoughts out onto my protagonist; I mean, I don't want readers to think that I really have these pre-meditated thoughts that my often-twisted characters have. Oh...but then I stop and realize, "Hey, don't take it all so seriously."
I am going to take a breath…not respond…and do what I have been doing. Write her ANOTHER letter. Yes, even my snail mail letters with the rent check inside do not get responded to.
JOHNNY DEPP/AL PACINO (Donnie Brasco)
Quick where's the TV listings guide magazine. Are there any comedy programmes on tonight?
Next up is Cupcake Flynn
3. Stash White Christmas White Tea. O.M.G. This is my new favorite tea of the season. I don't like peppermint, but I LOVE this tea. YUM. If you could put a snowy Christmas morning in a mug and drink it, this is what it would taste like.
Still in search of a new spot for posing, but today I had so much fun in this dusty field. Although I couldn't actually pose in it, my heels kept sinking into the mud. Which is not a good thing for suede shoes. I found this little square object on the floor that kind of looked like a picture frame so I thought it was photo worthy. The pattern of multicolored squares on this kimono reminds me of kente cloth. I wish that I could found some actual Kente cloth mmm..sounds like a new project is on the way.
Anyways, as Roj said last nights episode was fab and rather than expressing my thoughts on it I would urge you to read what Roj has posted as I agree with everything he says apart from the nonsense about RTD and the End Of Time specials :-)
It was only yesterday that I came across a thought provoking article in one of the issues of The Speaking Tree from the Times of India and my thoughts on Iran issue crystallized! That the world needs an able international interlocutor to deal with Iran! Now, what should be the qualities of this interlocutor saddled with the immense responsibility to bring Iran to the table?
Before and during the session people can feel different energy sensations working in their body. Some of these feelings can be tingling, electrical, vibrating, heat, coolness, cold, pressure, lightness and other things. If you feel very cold then this is a sign that old negative energy is leaving your system. Try to stay warm if you feel very cold.
I have written character descriptions and now I just have to find a place for these characters to come to life. Chad says, "You have to build the playground before you can play." I completely love this notion. I need to create characters that can play on and build the "playground" that is my show, then I need to build the "playground" by creating a setting and overall plot for the storyline. Once I have that in place I should be good to really dive into the writing a script part. So, I have the characters for the most part - I need to create a strong antagonist figure to the main character - and I need to now create a setting... I have ideas. I just need to pick one. I think I'll ask some friends and other people from my MAT program their thoughts. I need a location that allows room for truly funny things to happen, but where there is meaning behind the main character's life... where the plot (and the character) has more depth than merely the hilarious things that will happen to or because of her choices. If I can figure that out, this could be good... really good.
Next time you drive through downtown, take a gander at the 12 foot' herring sculpture in the garden at the smokehouse museum. It is a fabulous burst of creative enthusiasm, and I imagine on a day like to today, with a cleansing coastal breeze, is doing its thing and spinning to show all its colors.
And then we all caught on. We're going to trace your hands and cut them out. The poor kid thought he was going to have both hands amputated with a craft scissors.
The Shop Instructor works directly with students, faculty, and other shop instructors to ensure that all safety and dress codes are met and in accordance with established Art Center Shop policies. Responsibilities include providing a safe working environment for the students while helping them to use the machinery and tools within the shop; completing work orders from faculty, students, and staff; and assisting counter sales and tool check-in/out when necessary.
time to volunteer up!
He says “At bedtime, take your child by the hand, lead them back to the bed, tuck them in, then chat with them for a while. For a child, love is spelled T – I – M – E, and your child is more likely to open up and reveal his/her heart just before they go to sleep than at any other time of the day. Ten to fifteen minutes can make a big difference in the bonding process with your child by giving them that precious assurance that they are deeply loved, that you have time for them and they are more important than ten more minutes of television. Try this approach and I’ll SEE YOU—and your child—AT THE TOP!”
Let's see what the talented Corrosive design team has come up with to get you inspired...
It’s awesome. As soon as she hears one of my aunts say “We’re going to sing ‘Happy Birthday!’” Madison runs towards the counter, finds the birthday celebrant and says “I’m going to help you with your cake!” It’s not a question, and it isn’t really an offer, either. It’s mostly an ultimatum. My absolute favorite part is that she sings so loud and shouts the “Whoooo!” Rick Flair-style between the lines of the song while raising her hands like in the picture above.
shy, even to myself
“Give me a land of boughs in leaf
............that's it! I hate loads of rules in anything in life! If you want to mention the giveaway on your own blog it would be nice but I don't require it so don't worry about it if you don't want to.
I hope that more people will WAKE UP and shake away the lies of corporate media and the lies of massive PROPAGANDA unleashed on humanity by its wanna-be “masters” (banksters, all sorts of elite and oligarchs and other shadowy manipulators).
Under current law, soldiers accused of crimes against civilians or common crimes are tried in military tribunals, if at all. The legislation has moved very slowly; President Calderón sent the initiative to the Mexican Senate in October 2010.
Six years ago, this blog arrived in "the village" of sharing. In honor of #6, a download of the original "Prisoner" theme by Ron Grainer. It was rejected as a little too weak for such a groundbreaking, dramatic new TV series. Ron re-scored it with dramatic counterpoint, ominous brass, and stunning shifts between a single melody and literal thunder.
We substitute it for the things we think of as mundane.
I had to listen to how the poor dear lacrosse players at Duke are being persecuted just because they held someone down and fucked her against her will—not rape, of course, because the charges have been thrown out. Can’t a few white boys sexually assault a black woman anymore without people getting all wound up about it? So unfair.
'No visitors allowed' of course, and each passenger is frisked,
We have been travelling lately so I haven't been able to keep up with blogging. Also, perhaps like Kris a while back, I didn't feel "good enough" to blog for many a reasons!
With many great autographs to collect plus plenty of insert and parallel cards this set and should be a big hit and this blogger is looking forward to May of 2012. I just hope that Banks Autographed Originals finds its way into the collection.
I thought I'd share some of my favorite ways to celebrate the end of the year with my students. I do these things with whatever grade level I am teaching. Who doesn't enjoy some good-old blowing bubbles in the school yard?? Hehehe!
Need I ask, “Whom does that child obey; whom does he serve? By his very nature as a sinner, he obeys sin and the father of it. The unfortunate thing is that few know it. They do not understand the source of sin or the gravity of it.
Hang up try to text K but K isn't responding and isn't responding to her voice messages from my mother either. K finally picks up and gets an attitude with my mother for asking where in the hell is her passport. She responds she doesn't know. Maybe, it is at her fathers. That is when both me and my mother think oh shit. If it was he is such a asshole petty vengeful man he would just say it is lost because he doesn't want her to come and see me anyway. I have the scenario that she will have to reapply and that would be such a nightmare as it was the last time she first applied because of asshole ex's permission etc.
Early detection prevents blindness
We decided that during the next General Conference in April, we'll have to hide Sherman underneath the safety of one of the wooden kitchen chairs to protect him/her from the hopping feet of the toddler and inevitable blanket collapse that quickly follows.
Materiel is broken, stolen or sold off for a fraction of its worth. The result of decades of "foreign aid" has resulted in a continental infrastructure which, if one excludes South Africa, couldn’t support Pittsburgh.
Further,it would expose the state as undemocratic and controlling lawful parties political parties for their own interests.
Being Human Series 4 begins in the UK on Sunday 5th February (tomorrow!) on BBC3 at 9PM, with the intriguing title of episode one: ‘The Eve of the War’. It is expected to broadcast overseas later in the year.
trip I did get married, but it took another five years after that
Eggler – An egg dealer. Someone who gathers and sells eggs.
It won’t happen. Someone else has it and as far as I know, there is only one.
The demons found that aligning with Grandfather was beneficial to them and the majority of them settled under his rule. Others thought that it wasn’t to their advantage and chose a different route. Grandfather gave them a choice and did not question the choice they made, he does however insist that they live within the Eternal Laws. It is now Deanna’s role to make sure all beings, whether demon, angel, human or other being from one of the other worlds, keeps to the Eternal Laws.
If the local politicians sold out everything,even myself,I will rebuild everything.
That’s right – we said 30% off everything*. For a store that does not often run sales, this is a pretty big deal. You can get the sale on Sacs, Covers, Other Comfy Stuff (blankets, pillows, Nooder and friends, slippers), and even Sactionals. That’s right: you can get your dream living room at one of the best rates you’ll ever see in our store, all for the first hour of Black Friday. And of course, you can’t forget the limited edition packages. SuperSac Cow Phur Packages will be $599, while CitySac Cow Phur Packages will be $399.
2 - Wonderwall
Next time I need to use a light-colored cake though - you can see the chocolate cake peeking out from underneath the white chocolate! Hello Kitty is also missing her whiskers - oops! My edible ink pen wasn't working out on the chocolate.
The guy who sits about 15 feet over my left shoulder does the same kind of proofreading I do. Occasionally, we may have to communicate to coordinate our efforts, though we avoid it if we can. We’d rather duplicate each other’s work than allow air to pass over our larynxes, exit the voice box at the soft palette, and form into recognizable words and phrases.
I said, "I wouldn't have spelled it if I had wanted you to know!"
Would I go all the way to St. Ives again for the Queen’s? You bet I would and I’ll be bringing the kids too. Not only is the food good, the pub is super family friendly too.
for we are meant to be
Annette Andrea Dataram, 25, New York, N.Y.
6 Surely your goodness and unfailing love will pursue me all the days of my life, and I will live in the house of the LORD forever.
I had a little scan of my followers this morning and lo and behold ... 99 followers! I am one away from that elusive 100. So, if you are reading my blog and have not yet clicked that little "Join this site" button on the right hand side of this page, now is as good a time as any and you can be filled with the warm glow of having helped me reach one of my biggest, dare-I-even-dream-it goals.
Cut a 4" square of wool or woolfelt. Make a paper pattern by folding paper in half, then in half again and cut a pointed flower leaf shape. This doesn't have to be perfect. The tops of real strawberries are all different. :-) I used woolfelt for my leafy top and to get a mottled effect, I dipped a paint brush in bleach and dabbled it on the woolfelt. This removes some color and gives a more natural look. Place your paper pattern on the wool or woolfelt and cut around pattern piece.
Thanks to everyone who reads this blog - for your support, comments and enthusiasm about Yardage Design and my own little adventures this year while living in Spain. I really cannot tell you what a sanity saver this blog has been for me at times! We're going home for a few weeks in January, but we'll be returning to Spain after that, so the adventures will continue. I'm looking forward to some new challenges and projects next year - both for me and for Yardage Design.
Mickey came back out, handed us chocolate and explained what we were to do when certain things happened (laugh when he held up double loser fingers, clap and stand when Craig came out, dance when secretariat came out, clap after a really funny joke, and yell ‘the BIG CASH PRIZE’). Then the show started, we watched Craig do his thing, the running gag for that day was being silent in response to questions. The first segment featured the make-up and hair stylists, then Craig had his monologue, then came the tweets and emails, Jesse Tyler Ferguson came out (haha…pun) and he was funny, then Lennon Parham showed up and she was charming, then finally the ‘what did we learn on the show tonight Craig’ ending sequence. During the ‘commercial breaks’ (which were only 1-2 minutes long), they would play music and try to keep the audience engaged and moving with crappy music while moving the sets for the next segment (Craig’s desk is on wheels). After the show was over, they had the audience stay and do a few takes of us laughing and clapping.
Zionists have used deception and outright lies to further their aims for as long as Zionism has existed. We could go back into Biblical history to see documented evidence of Jews defaming those they wish to destroy. The foundation of the Jewish religion is based on lying to non-Jews – The Kol Nidre, which every Jew must recite at Yom Kippur, allows Jews to lie with impunity, nullifying all vows in advance for the coming year. Perhaps pathological lying is part of the Jewish psyche.
Dr. Dante glowered at her. "Just like your father."
-1 red bell pepper
RS is planning a 2013 Concert Tour. This is like research. I need a head set mic dat fits (flash backs of Harbourfront…lol). I like the drop down mic’s too. Dry Ice….smoke machines and hot bboys and bgirls.
When you pick a rubber stamp that will go into the box, have it pertain to the area it will be hidden in (there are many choices of rubber stamps in craft and hobby stores such as trees, flowers, bugs etc).
Dec 27th – REALLY needs to get away from the village. I can't get anything done. I haven't had a shower in a month. I want a REAL SHOWER, not one from a bucket. I want to wash my hair with clean water. I want a good night's sleep. This 3" foam mattress (and by foam I don't mean memory foam) is killing my back. Just two nights. I just want two nights. The next $75 in jewelry sales is going toward a vacation :)
I don’t get that. He heard a child crying. They were his own tears. Makes no sense to me. Tears are … well, tears, but cries you can hear. So was he crying like a child, and he heard himself crying? Or did he hear a child cry, and then start weeping himself?
Once you get a taste of it — you’ll know what it is.
Dr. Jane Moon is co-director of the Ur Region Archaeology Project (URAP), and an honorary research fellow at the University of Manchester, and one of those people who do wonderful things for Iraq, and in turn, humanity.
Your entries need to be in By 6pm Sunday May 6th.
The problem with these assertions that there are universal truths of morality is that throughout history, the foundations of these so-called universal truths have been used for justification for what we would consider atrocities today. What good is a universal truth given by a divine being over secular morality when, as found in the Old Testament (as an example), we find divine justification for genocide and capital punishment for seemingly (to us today) minor infractions? It seems that non-secular morality is merely justification for what we find necessary or useful at the time – whether its to justify personal decisions or social mores.
We can keep throwing money at the problem, but it’s not going to fix it, because it’s not a poverty of resources. It’s a poverty of relationship. And government can’t replace the family. Until we can rebuild families, and rebuild communities, there will always be people who fall through the cracks. We need strong families to raise strong people, and today those are in short supply. So if you want to help with poverty, build your marriage. Raise great kids. Encourage community at your school or your church. Let’s build relationships, which really are the best weapon to fight poverty.
This Apostolic Letter is one of the countless reasons that the people of God call Blessed John Paul II "The Great". In
I’ve decided to trim a lot of the fat in my life. And by fat, I mean, fake people who aren’t really friends, the negative feelings that surround me, and the literal fat.
Failure to cook a delicious dinner, so you have to eat P.F. Changs.
4. Paris is full of mysterious locations and scary little places. You could easily hide an alien sub-civilization there without anyone noticing. Take the little chapel in Le Marais where I located the Zookian door, the stargate Zelda uses to go back and forth from Vahalal, her home planet. There are plenty of places like that in Paris. There were so many secret societies that no longer exist. So many strange buildings devoted to their cults. They left behind all those surreal sites that fit perfectly in my zany science fiction stories.
I feel much saner with my diary because I am able to write down the tasks or concerns occupying my mind, and I feel the same way when I start the day in prayer to God. I can share all that is bothering me, concerning me, or just busying my mind, and when I allow Him to put them on His ‘to-do’ list I am able to go out into my day tackling one task at a time.
Message from the Hopi Elders
An EK Success border punch was used as the background frame
...and 4. I picked up some brand new makeup. It's amazing what a few highlights and a new foundation can do for your day. Thanks to Kristen's recommendations, I went with MAC, if any of you were wondering...
That's long.
I detest the sanctimoniousness of both Santorum and Romney. Are these statistics accurate? Probably. Are people who are at risk of either remaining in poverty or falling into poverty simply going to be able to will themselves to follow these rules? No, the vast majority of them aren't. Oh, sure, maybe some will respond well if you throw this set of stats at them and urge them to stay on the straight and narrow. And maybe some parents would push their kids to follow the guidelines as well.
Mr. Sapiens: Are the regular inhibition of normal reflexes for long periods (the blog, the call 1), non-inclusion of dietary fibre, vegetables and fruits (especially the dry ones) in ones diet and, not taking enough fluids, the only causes of constipation?
There are some totally Talented Artists in this class, and since I am a "Letter Art Newbie", it can be intimidating; however....I kept my chin up and continued on!!
1/2 tea ground cloves
For purposes of this group, 20 CFR 656.5(b)(1) defines the term “science or art” as any field of knowledge and/or skill with respect to which colleges and universities commonly offer specialized courses leading to a degree in the knowledge and/or skill.
It came to pass that I bought two small aubergines for 39p each and I was determined to do something Ottolenghi-ish with them. But since I can't quite get my hands on most of their other ingredients, I threw myself upon the culinary expertise of my Facebook friends.
Tiger Rice Cookers are some of the best known appliances of their type on the market, and have shown themselves again and again to do well in consumer rice cooker reviews. People love the retractable cords and sleek space-saving cooker design. They praise the removable inner cook pot. What no one seems to be doing is saying bad things about Tiger Rice Cookers, which leads one to think that there aren’t many bad points to be considered.
Well, two problems. First, to get to Lahaina I’d have to run on the highway on the northwest side of the island. After seeing the traffic on it for the first time I started to realize that wasn’t the best idea I’ve ever had. The second problem was how to get to Kaupo. The road you take (the road to Hana) is not all that friendly. My friend Angie, who graciously let me stay at her place while I was there, figured it’d take me two hours to drive over there. Then, after I got there, I had the problem of what the heck to do with the car. Ugh.
$8 self parking in Petersen Automotive Museum structure was full by 12:55pm! Not sure if next year's event will be held in the same venue and on the same day of the week, but I was happy to find street parking fairly easily just 2 blocks away, down Wilshire - free because it was Sunday!
Anna xx
I don't want to defend unschooling or cut down school. Even though I have strong opinions about it all. I know that children in school are loved and growing and learning just like the rest of us. The difference is that their lifestyle is accepted...they don't have to explain their choice over and over and over again to well-intentioned but ignorant people. They don't have to try and explain how they'll get into college (because they're in school and ALL schooled kids can get into college right?) or what they're being exposed to all day (because what happens in school is all so smarmy-marmy wonderful for children right?). No, they don't have to do that but neither do I.
Jason Chaffetz, who is one of Stringfellow's successors as a Utah Congressman, is hot under the collar over what he sees as himself being made to look a fool by publicly pinning medals on an 86-year-old former U.S. Air Force colonel, Myron "Mike" Brown, who presented him with papers saying he deserved three prestigious medals from his service sixty years ago.** Sometime after the ceremony, held in front of the media, The Salt Lake Tribune found out the documents were fraudulent. Chaffetz called congressional hearings on stolen valor, and is angry because when it comes to medals the military is sloppy in its record-keeping.
“They have never built a highway before this. Why give such a major project to them? This is not even their core business,” he told reporters at the Parliament lobby.
also--photos forthcoming. i need a new camera (hint, hint)
Tash
. Shares $ Market Value
All he would have to do is choose an appropriate sentiment, adhere it to the base, and voila! Instant, impressive card!
All the children of the world
begin their journey back to peace through A Course in Miracles.
Pres Sando was literally on fire yesterday…and it had nothing to do with past alumni Patrick Manning, Basdeo Panday, Machel Montano or Kes Dieffenthaler…..or did it? Paying for past sins, Pres?????
Next up, rugelach, which I can pretty much guarantee that I'll prefer.
The problem is Sheamus didn’t even outwrestle him, he just found a loophole on how to win, and took advantage of it. But in 9 days, things will go back to normal, he has a Best 2 of 3 Falls match against Sheamus, at Extreme Rules. Sheamus can’t bully a referee, he can’t bully people like he did with Alberto Del Rio. In 9 days, Daniel goes back to the city that made history for him, an event where nobody believed he can do it, a place where he cashed in the Money in the Bank briefcase.
There you go. Good. It only gets better from here....
7. The jaunty overnight music Once BBC 1 and BBC 2 stopped broadcasting for the day, Ceefax would come on accompanied by some repetitive but unmistakable music.
I woke up with a fever and a sore throat on Friday no fun at all. So Dan and I hunkered down in the ole homestead and had a Movie Weekend. First up was the camp classic Eating Raoul (1982) the fabulous tale of Paul and Mary Bland are a wine dealer and a nurse, respectively, who bemoan their low status in life and dream of opening a restaurant.
Also over the month we will be sharing many of the up incoming novel’s illustrations. They will not be the full illustration but the basic drawn portraits which are works of art in their own right. Hopefully it will get you interested to see their finished products when “Scar of Trees” is released!
The largest misconception is that Valerie Plame was a secret agent at or near the time the events unfolded. The truth is that Plame was outed many years before by secret documents that were leaked which rendered her a desk jockey at the CIA’s WMD Division at Langley. If anyone doubts that may I remind you that when this unfolded Plame had young twins at home, so unless the CIA is in the habit of sending pregnant moms to be with twins overseas undercover you are just going to have to accept that she was put on desk duty.
I took the entire bottle of pills in a few mighty gulps and then lay down in bed, waiting to be consumed by the end.
So there you have it, now for some rules:
What was the day of the eviction like?
"You crazy woman"
Some artists don’t just do art, some are art! They live and breathe to express themselves creatively not only through their work, but also through their life! And, I have the pleasure of personally knowing one of these individuals – Venezuelan artist Manuel Oliver. Manuel now lives in South Florida (for the past 8 years), with his studio located in Ft. Lauderdale. I met Manuel through one of my clients and was so intrigued by his work, his passion, his message and ultimately he as a person. So much so that I thought it would be great (and a natural fit for my blog – Art of South Florida) to introduce and share Manuel’s work with all of you. See below for interview and images:
” I’m just thrilled we got him back. I was scared to death. There were a lot of teams out there that had money,” said Collins. ” I was scared to death some team was going to throw this offer at us, $11 million a year or something like that, that could of dramatically changed the way we build this franchise.”
Ben said:
- Gilford , Follan and Cameron purchase blocks at Bambara Rd
When I first listed the details of that antique shop/mysterious object story idea it seemed as if there was just one way that things could play out. We're all conditioned to go for what's obvious first time around. The trick is to stop and take a step back - take away the shadow of all those hackneyed, typical, over-used images, characters, settings and plots. Leave yourself and your idea room to grow, to reach for the sun. Then you will produce the story that *only* you can write. Which is the only story that most of us want to write, after all.
And I suddenly found myself one step closer to a fantasy of being self sustaining. I couldnt help but be excited. Conversely though, Im moving from an everything-in-my-reach location where all my friends and work resided within a 15 minute walk, to a place that was 30 minutes to the CBD alone, by train. Plus an extra 15 mins to the station from my house, by bicycle. I was to go from being a dedicated inner south-sider, to residing in the deep north, where I knew nothing of how to get around and where to go. In exchange for a place to run chickens and grow my own food, Im taking giant steps away from “the hub”. And I got nerves about the sea-change (however small it actually was). How often would I see my friends? Would they ever come visit? How would I get to castings and jobs? …did I mention I don’t have a car??
Beauty unrivalled, charm deathly, rode her horse, Lady Abigail aglow ;
Gordon also brings up some difficulties posed by our current style of “worship” in church – for instance, the usage of words on a large screen in front of the church rather than using hymnals at all. I’ve often lamented this, as there is no music to follow. It’s not too enjoyable (not to mention not very “worshipful”) to try to “sing” a new song with only words to go by.
Kiley weighed 11 lb.s and 2.5 oz. at her Dec. 23rd doctor appt. She slipped a little percentile wise in weight because of her illness. But, we bumped up her oz. and frequency to "chub" her up a little more.
So I didn’t. I’m simply reprinting this great comment here, to share with all and sundry. There is so much to chew on and a whole lot of insight. Thank you, commenter Lloyd Gray, whoever and wherever you are! (He wrote this under the post about the mom who let her son walk to soccer and got slammed by the police.)
With the exception of the new trail, these are trails I have been on numerous times. They are among my favorites in the Chicago area. The Great Western Trail isn’t super-scenic, but I think it is a well-kept secret. The Prairie Path gets packed during good weather, but the GWT is less busy. It is well-maintained, but I guess people don’t like its lack of scenery. For this ride, I parked in the forest preserve lot on Prince Crossing Rd.
A little while back, I blogged about yet another of the ways in which PublishAmerica was attempting to extract cash from its authors: a fee-charging "literary agency."
Although Vernon Jackson’s minister, Pastor Annita Hogue is old school, it is considered immoral in black society today for a black to confess to committing a crime against a white and take his punishment, and Jackson’s relatives have already rolled out the black “honor student defense.” As WDBJ News reported, “family members tell a different story about Vernon Jackson, saying he is a good kid who attended church regularly and was well liked by his classmates at Heritage High School.”
Emily scored a goal during the game, but I'm pretty sure the overall score was a tie. They all had a great time and played very well against each other, with little or no competitiveness. I love that about recreational leagues.
I am SO excited to be participating in today's Marvelous Middle-Grade Monday, yay!!! Did I say I was excited? So, yes, I am a big fan of Shannon Messenger who created MMGM to shine a spotlight on sharing and discussing fantastic middle-grade literature. Please click here to visit her website and view a list of links to other blogs participating in MMGM with reviews, contests, and more. Plus, follow Shannon to learn all about the release of both her debut middle-grade novel AND debut young adult novel coming soon. I can't wait to read them both!
He worked his way over to Albany, New York, as a successful distiller and grain merchant with his brother. Franklin took full advantage of drink demands during the Civil War; his company soon became so profitable that he moved the entire venture to New York in 1866.
We ate lots of great food and enjoyed out trip last year and we also had a great trip this year. I planned this trip and decide where to stay, where to eat and stuff. My husband loved everything I planned so I was very happy :-)
1. Sesame Street Monsters - I Can't Help It
Hell it is not supposed to be this hard. I can remember 8 digit number in 10 seconds but can`t remember what I ate an hour ago. The hell is that about?
- perform CPR if victim is not breathing
Recorded in New York, on May 10, 1955
“What a pretty foot you have,
home and the better AP is going home the next transfer. I really don’t know what I’m going to do if we get another AP like the one we have right now I’m done dealing with this one. He’s lazy, prideful and just
Setting out to go fishing with his friends at Leech Lake, the past taps Treuer on the shoulder again as he looks back to see the angry white protestors who not so long ago stood at the dock with signs that said “Save a Walleye-Spear an Indian.” In 1985, the US Supreme court ruled that the Wisconsin Ojibwe had retained the right to fish and hunt on ceded land as agreed to in treaties made with the government. The decision angered sports fishermen and those who make a buck on fishing tourism who didn’t want the Ojibwe fishing walleye to eat when they needed the walleye to create a nice vacation for someone.
Three prime coaching spots could come open by December – Florida (where Urban Meyer’s health remains a question), Georgia (Muschamp’s alma mater) and LSU (where Muschamp was once defensive coordinator). Each would be attractive.
“I prefer to define myself as new age music because of my fashion, music, style and background/ancestry. All of those culminate into one unique thing. Once you’re pigeonholed as something, that’s what you are and you can’t ever branch out so I like to be classified simply as an artist. I like Johnny Cash, Ray Charles, Bob Marley, Jim Morrison, John Lennon, Frank Sinatra and so much more. All of those are influences on my music.”
Front row: Uncle Charlie, my cousin Charlie, Sarah, Auntie Noel, Laura, Stephen holding Molly
So here we go. Ready? Too bad, 'cause here we go!
2:35 PM – Mobile network Choke
You Ain't Seen Nothing Yet
If you like any of the songs, please show your appreciation by liking the videos on Youtube. You can find us by inserting The Soul Intention or ValentinaMarie8 into the Youtube search engine.
St Clement’s Old School
This time I have decided to let visuals take over for the most part for this assessment. You are more than welcome to ask follow-up questions that are of global importance.
Claudia Strassers The Paris Apartment book was first published 16 years ago, but to me it NEVER gets old. I've mentioned on many occasions this book has been my bed companion for a long time and even travelled with me to Europe as I couldn't bear to part with it. Pages 74 and 75 are almost permanently open on my dressing table and often when passing I find myself wishing I could dive into those glossy pages.
Ah shit, you had to throw that one in there. Pink Mountaintops. It has to do with the music for sure, because Black Mountain is more like metal and Pink Mountaintops is more like the Velvet Underground.
Mathematics is an ecology that would not benefit from having everyone compete directly against everyone else all the time. Emerging research areas often grow in small niches first before hitting it big time. A less fashionable area might carve out a bit of room for itself – and thus live to see the day when it becomes fashionable again. (Additive number theory comes to mind.) A centrally planned megasystem might recreate the complex environment that we have now, or it might not. And if mathematicians in some area felt that they were getting the short end of the stick… why, they might even come up with the idea of having a specialized journal for themselves! That’s why I wouldn’t really expect such a centralized system to last very long, even if people could be convinced to buy into it in the first place, which is not likely.
Gardner creates wild, spontaneous conductions of improvised
someday, i might want to replace this old bench with something more rustic.
Even better, I expect to have a new post up within a week, Randy Holland's Cat Mind album--some very tasty private press, loner rock.
Nikki Euphonique is a Jungle, D’n’B and radio DJ (Unity Radio) hailing from Manchester. Breaking through in 2011 with her “Amen Sister EP” she has worked tirelessly to forward herself and the Jungle scene within Manchester. After finishing runner up in the Skiddle DJ rankings she began to gain sets at festivals and get noticed within the music scene
We've heard so much of this new Japanese, Chinese American type food buffet from multiple friends. We didn't think much about it because you tend to think buffets are the same. Kumo though brought rave reviews from our friends. I love all Authentic Asian as well as Asian American influenced food. It's probably some of my favorite foods.
Weeks later (likely it was 5 minutes), girl realizes: no, not from door-to-door. But her brain was somewhere between a Sally-Foster gift wrap sales routine and Will Smith's own Pursuit of Happyness, desperate to push bone density scanners. Was this boy about to slap girl for two extra rolls of glitter-snowflake and end the night examining x-rays? Of course not. Obviously, that boy and girl was hubs and me. Not door-to-door, but huge, commercially... and so would begin my peek into the secret world of chicken.
The worldʼs behaviours have changed the place we live in, to a large extent, for the worse. Be it eating habits resulting in obesity, travel habits resulting in climate change or consumption habits resulting in an economic recession, a creature of habit has a brain that is on autopilot making decisions through automatic responses.
Now I don’t think Apple has got everything right. In recent years there’s been far too much emphasis on making things ‘cooler’ and ‘thinner’ than ever while reliability and functionality have in some cases taken a back seat. The lack of FireWire on modern Macs, the removal of FireWire charging and syncing on iPods and the like, the increasingly bloated and resource hogging nature of iTunes are some examples. The latter issue being somewhat poignant for me as it was iTunes 3′s clean interface and relatively low resource footprint on the PC that drew me to buy a Mac in the first place. I suppose I’m a bit at odds with other consumers but I don’t always want new features in my software, I very often want the ones I already have to work faster or more reliably. Almost contradictorily, I’m also very interested in convergence, that is getting more ‘productivity’ from a particular device, especially mobile phones.
It is the offensive side of intelligence agencies that are the most developed, the most organised, the most sophisticated, - and for obvious reasons, also the most cunning and the most secret. The true nature of their offensive techniques, and the high level of sophistication involved, are NEVER, and I repeat - NEVER, made known to the general populace. This is why I never report on matters related to the so-called leaks of WikiLeaks, as the info they share with the general populace is useless and outdated - (Click here to view a previous article on this blog related to WikiLeaks).
On to stuffing bras:
Stop it.
Brookie.. is a whole different personality...... she has zero patience. She can go from smiling and happy to a full blown ear piercing scream in one second. Once Brookie has had enough of something......she has had enough!!.....there are no warnings..... there are no cues......she just breathes in .....and screams!
Today's featured jersey is a 2000-01 Manitoba Moose Johan Hedberg jersey as worn by Hedberg during his time in Winnipeg prior to being traded to the Penguins.
And if she tempts you with her charms
There are several scenes like this in the movie which are surprisingly emotional and I’m not ashamed to say I could feel some tears starting to swell beneath my eyes a few times. If THE MUPPETS was simply nostalgia, it could be played just for laughs because the thing about nostalgia is that it comes with a recognition that those times are past. We might recapture faded glories for a moment or two, but they’re not coming back. MUPPETS is so much more than that because it’s not just an ode to what used to be, but an admission that important things were lost. THE MUPPETS really isn’t about making the Muppets popular again (that’s the understandable and external goal of Disney); it’s about scolding you for letting go of loved ones, and giving up on dreams. There’s a reason this film is out during the holiday season – it’s much easier to forget about disconnected friends and family in May or August, but not so easy during the Thanksgiving to New Year’s run. MUPPETS doesn’t just invite the Muppets back for one last nostalgia ride, but demonstrates how to get the important things in life back into your own life. There’s plenty of laughs and gags on the surface, but deep down THE MUPPETS is a film about recentering the self and the soul.
So Joshua ascended from Gilgal, he and all the people of war with him, and all the mighty men of valor. The Lord said to Joshua, “Do not fear them, for I have delivered them into your hand; not a man of them shall stand before you.”
129. Many Indonesia netizens says he looks like Morgan Sm*sh.
That story put out by Kuwaiti and Khan, which was evidently an effort to explain his regular monthly visits to Peshawar, eventually reached the ISI detachment in Abbottabad. The result was a routine request to the detachment in Peshawar to make an inquiry to confirm the information. After months of methodical checking in Peshawar, the ISI unit there reported that none of the half-dozen Arshad Khans who were money changers was a resident of Abbottabad. The inconsistency was conveyed to ISI headquarters in early 2010, with a request for an expanded search in other towns, according to the ISI sources. A request was then sent to all major cities in Pakistan, just in case somebody had gotten the location of the business wrong.
The card itself is 4 3/4" x 6 3/4". The white mat is 4 1/2" x 6 1/2", and the striped mat is 4 1/4" x 6 1/4". The chocolate bunnies are from the Easter cart. I think the left bunny was cut at about 3" (on Flip), and the right bunny is 3 3/4" (also with Flip). The background scalloped circle was cut at 4 1/2" with Real Dial Size on, and the grass was cut three times at 2". Everything is inked except the brown cuts. I used a Stampin' Up scalloped circle punch to take a "bite" out of the left bunny's butt, and the right bunny's ear.
How do we discover order in disorder? How do we learn to navigate our lives effectively whether we have stability or uncertainty as we relate to what our environments bring us? The highest benefit to our lives is understanding the place of knowing within ourselves that can bring us the realization of the opportunity of strange attractors, and how we can capitalize on them to bring our lives to new equilibrium.
Well there is plenty of inspiration to be had with this yummy photo, maybe the gorgeous red will inspire you, or could it be the ribbons, or the roses?? Maybe cakes come to mind as well as love and weddings, even some of the smallest detail such as the embossing on the cake stand...see there are just so many possibilites with this one.
that was it. gone. nothing. no post. nothing.
“And he trembling and astonished said, Lord, what wilt thou have me to do?”
preparation methods, the cleanliness and so forth. There are no
If I am envied now, than I still have much further to go. Perfect. Normal. That will NEVER be enough. A compliment is just a nice way of telling you of how little you are worth.
Bruce Irvin and Bobby Wagner are both decent players, but they would’ve each been there a round later if the Seahawks had waited to take them. Russell Wilson was the only pick they made that I liked.
Genre: Puzzle-Platformer.
After my humiliating introduction to adventure sports, I vowed never to go near a zipwire again.
onto the curb, onto the median, onto the hot concrete
Hercules weighed 38 pounds.
I spoke with one sovereign credit guru who was supportive of The Slog’s view about Mario Draghi at the ECB limbering up for some serious QE. “The ECB Council has a big meeting this week,” he told me, “and you can bet the farm that Draghi will either cut interest rates close to it being Zirp for Europe – or start buying State bank as well as private bank junk. In my opinion, he’ll do both.”
In the Tuesday 1 February 2011 print issue of The South African newspaper, distributed in London, we incorrectly printed that Lara Johnstone had flown to London to lodge the appeal herself, which is not the case. Ms Johnstone filed the Amicus Curiae application from South Africa. We apologise for the confusion caused.
The fields around me are still covered with white. I thought the snow would melt fast, but it still looks like January outside. Trees and power lines are down all over town. I'm one of the lucky 35 percent or so of Amherst residents who have power back.
Mr Elbows has fallen asleep. A triangle has been formed by the top of his arm, the back of the seat and the tiny piece of armrest he hasn’t claimed. It’s a bewitching little niche. I don’t even care that my arm would end up touching his if I put it there. Gently does it, just slide right in and he won’t even notice. He grunts, turns his head and slams his arm into the back of the chair, almost catching my skin on his way. The triangle is gone. Damn it.
"Yep. A miseryta," Mister Bartender said, smilin'.
Placing bounties on opposing players threatens the NFL as a whole, directly. The NFL is in a constant back-and-forth with former players over player safety. I do think that the NFL has done the best that they can when it comes to player safety. There is no way that they could let the Saints off with a minimal punishment for intentionally injuring players, and look former and current players in the eye and say “We’re looking out for your safety”. If they would have let the Saints off with a fine and a strongly worded letter, it would send a crystal-clear message to the rest of the NFL: Bounties are all right. The NFL and Goodell decided to scorch the Earth that surrounds the Superdome to send a very different message: We will not tolerate placing any kind of an incentive on injuring another player.
Last week, I was thinking a lot about how I needed to make sure my friends knew that I was there for them. My sister advised me that the best thing to do was to say it outright. You don’t have to prove yourself with some heroic act of acceptance or love, you just have to tell them, especially when you know that physically you can’t always be there with them, helping them through the hard times.
One can only hope that more companies adopt this idea.
Previously reported that singer Se7en will be promoting his follow up hit titled ‘I’m Going Crazy’.
The E stands for horrible brain problems, like cognitive dysfunction, i.e., problems with information processing like making a telephone call, reading or watching TV. It also means hypersensitivity to noise and light, severe headaches, severe dizziness, tinnitus etc.
Obama is so weak that he has continued and even enhanced many of the military and foreign policy strategies of Bush.
